"Very well, John; I have nothing more to say.  You can commence
proceedings as soon as you choose.  I shall not contest them."

The speaker was a slight, graceful woman of perhaps thirty-five years.
Her figure was a little above the medium stature, and symmetrical,
almost perfect, in its proportions.  Her beautiful, refined face and
proudly poised, shapely head were crowned with a wealth of soft brown
hair, in which there was a glint of red, and which lay in bright
profusion above her white forehead, in charming contrast with the
delicate fairness of her skin, which, at the present moment, was
absolutely colorless.

Drawn to her full height, she was standing opposite her companion, her
large, expressive gray eyes, in which pity and scorn struggled for
supremacy, lifted to his in a direct, unflinching gaze which bespoke
the strength of purpose and straightforward character of one who
possessed the courage of her convictions; while, in her rich-toned
voice, as well as in her crisp, decisive sentences, there was a note of
finality which plainly indicated that she had taken her stand regarding
the matter under discussion, and would abide by it.

"What!  Am I to understand that you do not intend to contest
proceedings for a divorce, Helen?"

Surprise and an unmistakable intonation of eagerness pervaded John
Hungerford's tones as he spoke, while, at the same time, he searched
his wife's face with a curious, almost startled, look.

At a casual glance the man impressed one as possessing an unusually
attractive personality.

He had a fine, athletic figure--tall, broad-shouldered,
well-proportioned--which, together with an almost military bearing,
gave him a distinguished air, that instantly attracted attention
wherever he went.  A clear olive complexion, dark-brown eyes and hair,
handsomely molded features, and a luminous smile, that revealed white,
perfect teeth, completed the _tout ensemble_ that had made havoc with
not a few susceptible hearts, even before he had finally bestowed his
coveted affections upon beautiful Helen Appleton, whom later he had
made his wife.  But upon closer acquaintance one could not fail to
detect disappointing lines in his face, and corresponding flaws in his
character--a shifty eye, a weak mouth and chin, an indolent,
ease-loving temperament, that would shirk every responsibility, and an
insatiable desire for personal entertainment, that betrayed excessive
selfishness and a lack of principle.

"No," the woman coldly replied to her husband's exclamation of
astonishment, "I have no intention of opposing any action that you may
see fit to take to annul our union, provided----"

She paused abruptly, a sudden alertness in her manner and tone.

"Well?" he questioned impatiently, and with a frown which betokened
intolerance of opposition.

"Provided you do not attempt to take Dorothy from me, or to compromise
me in any way in your efforts to free yourself."

The man shrugged his broad shoulders and arched his fine eyebrows.

"I am not sighing for publicity for either you or myself, Helen," he
observed.  "I simply wish to get the matter settled as quickly and
quietly as possible.  As for Dorothy, however----"

"There can be no question about Dorothy; she is to be relinquished
absolutely to me," Helen Hungerford interposed, with sharp decision.

"You appear to be very insistent upon _that_ point," retorted her
companion, with sneering emphasis and an unpleasant lifting of his
upper lip that just revealed the tips of his gleaming teeth.

"I certainly am; that my child remains with me is a foregone
conclusion," was the spirited reply.

"The judge may decree differently----"

"You will not dare suggest it," returned the wife, in a coldly quiet
tone, but with a dangerous gleam in her eyes.  "No judge would render
so unrighteous a decree if I were to tell my story, which I certainly
should do if driven to it.  I have assented to your demand for this
separation, but before I sign any papers to ratify the agreement you
will legally surrender all claim to, or authority over, Dorothy."

"Indeed!  Aren't you assuming a good deal of authority for yourself,
Helen?  You appear to forget that Dorothy is my child as well as
yours--that I love her----"

"_Love her!_"  Exceeding bitterness vibrated in the mother's voice.
"How have you shown your love for her?  However, it is useless to
discuss that point.  I have given you my ultimatum--upon no other
condition will I consent to this divorce," she concluded, with an air
of finality there was no mistaking.

"I swear I will not do it!" John Hungerford burst forth, with sudden
anger.

An interval of silence followed, during which each was apparently
absorbed in troubled thought.

"Possibly it will make no difference whether you do or do not accede to
my terms," Mrs. Hungerford resumed, after a moment, "for it has
occurred to me that there is already a law regulating the guardianship
of minors, giving the child a voice in the matter; and, Dorothy being
old enough to choose her own guardian, there can be little doubt
regarding what her choice would be."

"You are surely very sanguine," sneered her husband.

"And why should I not be?" demanded the woman, in a low but intense
tone.  "What have you to offer her?  What have you ever done for her,
or to gain her confidence and respect, that could induce her to trust
her future with you?  How do you imagine she will regard this last
humiliation to which you are subjecting her and her mother?"

John Hungerford flushed a conscious crimson as these pertinent
questions fell from the lips of his outraged wife.  His glance wavered
guiltily, then fell before the clear, accusing look in her eyes.

"Oh, doubtless you have her well trained in the rôle she is to play,"
he sullenly observed, after an interval of awkward silence, during
which he struggled to recover his customary self-assurance.  "You have
always indulged her lightest whim, and so have tied her securely to
your apron strings, which, it goes without saying, has weakened my hold
upon her."

His companion made no reply to this acrid fling, but stood in an
attitude of quiet dignity, awaiting any further suggestions he might
have to offer.

But, having gained his main point--her consent to a legal
separation--the man was anxious to close the interview and escape from
a situation that was becoming exceedingly uncomfortable for him.  At
the same time, he found it no easy matter to bring the interview to a
close and take final leave of the wife whom he was repudiating.

"Well, Helen," he finally observed, assuming a masterful tone to cover
his increasing embarrassment, "I may have more to say regarding
Dorothy, later on--we will not discuss the matter further at present.
Now, I am going--unless you have something else you wish to say to me."

Helen Hungerford shivered slightly at these last words, and grew marble
white.

Then she suddenly moved a step or two nearer to him, and lifted her
beautiful face to him, a solemn light in her large gray eyes.

"Yes, I have something else I would like to say to you, John," she
said, her voice growing tremulous for the first time during their
interview.  "This separation is, as you know, of your own seeking, not
mine.  A so-called divorce, though sanctioned a thousand times by
misnamed law, means nothing to me.  When I married you I pledged myself
to you until death should part us, and I would have held fast to my
vows until my latest breath.  I may have made mistakes during the years
we have lived together, but you well know that whenever I have taken a
stand against your wishes it has always been for conscience's sake.  I
have honestly tried to be a faithful wife--a true helpmeet, and a wise
mother.  I have freely given you the very best there was in me to give.
Now, at your decree, we are to part.  I make no contest--I hurl no
reproaches--I simply submit.  But I have one last plea to make: I beg
of you not to ruin your future in the way you are contemplating--you
know what I mean--for life is worthless without an honored name,
without the respect of your fellow men, and, above all, without
_self-respect_.  You have rare talent--talent that would lift you high
upon the ladder of fame and success, if you would cease to live an
aimless, barren existence.  For your own sake, I pray you will not
longer pervert it.  That is all.  Good-by, John; I hear Dorothy coming,
and you may have something you would like to say before you go."

She slipped quietly between the portières near which she had been
standing, and was gone as a door opened to admit a bright, winsome
lassie of about fifteen years.

Dorothy Hungerford strongly resembled her mother.  She was formed like
her; she had the same pure complexion, the same large, clear gray eyes
and wealth of reddish-brown hair, which hung in a massive braid--like a
rope of plaited satin--between her shoulders, and was tied at the end
with a great bow of blue ribbon.

The girl paused abruptly upon the threshold, and flushed a startled
crimson as her glance fell upon her father.

"Where--is mamma?" she inquired, in evident confusion.

"Your mother has just gone to her room," the man replied, his brows
contracting with a frown of pain as he met his daughter's beautiful but
clouded eyes.  "Come in, Dorothy," he added, throwing a touch of
brightness into his tones; "I wish to have a little talk with you."

The maiden reluctantly obeyed, moving forward a few paces into the room
and gravely searching her father's face as she did so.

"I suppose you know that I am going away, Dorothy?  Your mother has
told you--ahem!--of the--the change I--we are contemplating?" John
Hungerford inquiringly observed, but with unmistakable embarrassment.

"Yes, sir," said Dorothy, with an air of painful constraint.

"How would you like to come with me, dear?  You have a perfect right to
choose with whom you will live for the future."

"I choose to live with my mother!"  And there was now no constraint
accompanying the girl's positive reply.

The man's right hand clenched spasmodically; then his dark eyes blazed
with sudden anger.

"Ha!  Evidently your mother has been coaching you upon the subject," he
sharply retorted.

"Mamma hasn't said a word to me about--about that part of the--the
plan," Dorothy faltered.

"Then you mean me to understand that, of your own free will, you prefer
to remain with your mother altogether?"

Dorothy nodded her drooping head in assent, not possessing sufficient
courage to voice her attitude.

"Pray tell me what is your objection to living with me--at least for a
portion of each year?"

The child did not immediately answer.  The situation was an exceedingly
trying one, and she appeared to be turning her father's proposition
over in her mind.

At length she lifted her head, and her eyes met his in a clear, direct
gaze.

"Where are you going to live?" she questioned, with significant
emphasis.

Her companion shrank before her look and words as if he had been
sharply smitten.

"That is not the question just at present," he said, quickly recovering
himself.  "I asked what objection you have to living with me.  Don't
you love me at all?"

Again Dorothy's head fell, and, pulling the massive braid of her ruddy
hair over her shoulder, she stood nervously toying with it in silence.

"Dorothy, I wish you to answer me," her father persisted, greatly
irritated by her attitude toward him, and growing reckless of
consequences in his obstinate determination to force her to give him a
definite answer.

But Dorothy was not devoid of obstinacy herself.  She pouted
irresolutely a moment; then, tossing her braid back into its place,
stood erect, and faced her father squarely.

"Why are you going away--why will you not live here with mamma?"

Again the man flushed hotly.  He was guiltily conscious that she knew
well enough why.

"I--we are not congenial, and it is better that we live apart," he
faltered, as he shifted uncomfortably from one foot to the other.
Then, becoming suddenly furious in view of being thus arraigned by his
own child, he thundered: "Now I command you to give me your reason for
refusing to live with me during some portion of each year!  I know," he
went on, more temperately, "that you love your mother, and I would not
wish to take you from her altogether; but I am your father--I certainly
have some claim upon you, and it is natural that I should desire to
keep you with me some of the time.  Now, tell me at once your
objections to the plan," he concluded sternly.

The interview had been a severe strain upon the delicately organized
and proud-spirited girl, and she had found great difficulty in
preserving her self-control up to this point; but now his tone and
manner were like spark to powder.

"Because----  Oh, because I think you are just horrid!  I used to think
you such a gentleman, and I was proud of you; but now you have shamed
me so!  No, I don't love you, and I wouldn't go to live with you
and--and _that dreadful woman_ for anything!" she recklessly threw back
at him.

For a minute John Hungerford stood speechless, staring blankly at his
child, his face and lips colorless and drawn.  Her words had stabbed
him cruelly.

"Dorothy, you are impertinent!" he said severely, when he could command
his voice.

She caught her breath sharply; she bit her lips fiercely, her white
teeth leaving deep imprints upon them; then passion swept all before it.

"I know it--I _feel_ impertinent!  I feel awful wicked, as if I could
do something dreadful!" she cried shrilly and quivering from head to
foot from mingled anger and grief.  "You have broken mamma's heart, and
it breaks mine, too, to see her looking so crushed and getting so white
and thin.  And now you are going to put this open disgrace upon
her--upon us both--just because you are tired of her and think you like
some one else better.  I do love my mother--she is the dearest mother
in the world, and I'm glad you're going.  I--I don't care if I
never----"

Her voice broke sharply, at this point, into something very like a
shriek.  She had wrought herself up to a frenzy of excitement, and now,
with great sobs shaking her slight form like a reed, she turned
abruptly away, and dashed wildly out of the room, slamming the door
violently behind her.


John Hungerford was stricken with astonishment and dismay by the
foregoing outburst of passion from his child.  As a rule, she had ever
been gentle and tractable, rarely defying his authority, and never
before had he seen her manifest such temper as she had just given way
to.  He had always believed that she loved him, although he had long
been conscious of a growing barrier between them--that she invariably
sought her mother's companionship when she was in the house, and held
aloof from him.  But he had been so absorbed in his own pursuits that
he had not given much serious thought to the matter; consequently it
had now come like a bolt from a clear sky, when she had openly declared
that she did not love him, while he was at no loss for words to
complete the scathing, unfinished sentence to which she had given
utterance just before she had fled from his presence.

It had taken him unawares, and, indifferent as he had become to his
responsibilities as a husband and father; determined as he was to cut
loose from them to gratify his pleasure-loving and vacillating
disposition, his heart was now bruised and lacerated, his proud spirit
humiliated as it never before had been, by Dorothy's passionate
arraignment and bitter repudiation of him.

His wife, greatly to his surprise, had received him with her accustomed
courtesy, had quietly acceded to his wishes when he informed her that
he contemplated seeking a divorce, and had calmly told him that she had
no intention of contesting his application for a legal separation.  He
had not believed he would be able to secure his freedom so easily, and
secretly congratulated himself that the matter had been so quickly
adjusted, and had terminated without a scene, even though he had been
not a little chagrined by his wife's dignified bearing and a certain
conscious superiority throughout the interview; also by the absence of
all excitement or sentiment, except as, now and then, a flash of scorn
or pity for him leaped from her eyes or rang in her tones.

But it had been quite another thing to have Dorothy, whom he had always
fondly loved, in his selfish way, so openly denounce him for his
faithlessness to her mother, and impeach him for the humiliation to
which he was about to subject them both.  As his anger subsided, as he
began to realize something of what it meant, he was cut to the quick,
and a sickening sense of loss and desolation suddenly swept over him,
causing his throat to swell with painful tension and his eyes to sting
with a rush of hot tears.

His only child--his pet and little playmate for fifteen years--had
practically told him that she would not care if she never saw him
again.  It seemed almost as if she had suddenly died and were lost to
him forever.  He wondered if he ever would see her again, hear her
fresh young voice calling "papa," or feel her soft lips caressing his
cheek.

He stood for several minutes staring miserably at the door through
which she had disappeared, a long, quivering sigh heaving his broad
chest.  Then his eyes swept the familiar, tastefully arranged room,
which showed the graceful touch of his wife's deft hands in every
detail, and finally rested upon the great bow of blue ribbon which had
become loosened from Dorothy's hair and fallen to the floor almost at
his feet.

He stooped, picked it up, and thrust it into his bosom; then
mechanically took his hat, and quietly left the house.

But, as the outer door closed behind him, and the latch clicked sharply
into its socket, there shot through all his nerves a thrill of keen
pain which for many years repeated itself whenever the same sound fell
upon his ears.

There seemed to be an ominous knell of finality in it, and, mingling
with it, a sinister jeer at his supreme folly in thus turning his back
forever upon this attractive, though comparatively simple, home, with
its atmosphere of purity and sweet, refining influences; in discarding
the beautiful and loyal woman whom he had once believed he adored; in
abandoning and forfeiting the affection and respect of a lovely
daughter, who also gave promise of becoming, in the near future, a
brilliant and cultured woman, and--for what?

More than an hour elapsed after Dorothy fled from her father's presence
before she could control herself sufficiently to seek her mother, who
also had been fighting a mighty battle in the solitude of her own room.
Even then the girl's eyes were red and swollen from excessive weeping;
neither had she been able to overcome wholly the grief-laden sobs
which, for the time, had utterly prostrated her.

"Mamma, he has told me, and--he has gone," she faltered, almost on the
verge of breaking down again, as she threw herself upon her knees by
her mother's side and searched with anxious eyes the white, set face of
the deserted wife.

"Yes, dear; I heard him go."

"Do you think it will be forever?"

"That is what a divorce--a legal separation--means, Dorothy."

The girl dropped her head upon her mother's shoulder, with a moan of
pain, and Helen slipped a compassionate arm around the trembling form.

"Mamma," Dorothy began again, after a few moments of silence.

"Well, dear?"

"I think it is awful--what he is doing; but don't you think that
we--you and I--can be happy again, by and by, just by ourselves?"

"I am sure we can, dearest," was the brave response, as Helen
Hungerford drew her daughter closer to her in a loving embrace.

Dorothy seized her mother's hand and kissed it passionately, two great,
burning tears dropping upon it as she did so.

"He asked me to go with him--to live with him some of the time," she
presently resumed.

"And you told him----" breathed Helen, almost inaudibly.

"I was very disrespectful, mamma," confessed the girl humbly; "but I
couldn't help it when I thought what it all meant.  I said I wouldn't
live with him for anything--I almost told him that I wouldn't care if I
never saw him again.  Where will he go now?  What will he do?  Will--he
marry _that woman_?" she concluded, her voice growing hard and tense
again.

Her mother's lips grew blue and pinched with the effort she made to
stifle a cry of agony at the shameful suggestion.  But she finally
forced herself to reply, with some semblance of composure:

"I do not know, Dorothy, and we will try not to worry over anything
that he may do.  However, when he secures the necessary decree from the
court he will have the legal right to do as he pleases."

"The _legal_ right," repeated Dorothy reflectively.

"Yes, the law will give him the right to marry again if he wishes to do
so."

"What an abominable law!  And what a shameful thing for any man to want
to do, when he already has a family!  What will people think of us if
he does?" queried the girl, with a shiver of repulsion.

"My dear, ask rather what people will think of _him_," said her mother
tenderly, as she laid her lips in a gentle caress against the child's
forehead.

"Of course, I know that nice people will not respect him; but I can't
help feeling that the shame of it will touch us, too," opposed
sensitive Dorothy.

"No, dear; what he has done, or may do, cannot harm either you or me in
the estimation of our real friends," replied Helen, throwing a note of
cheer she was far from feeling into her tones.  "It can only bring
condemnation upon himself, and you are not to feel any sense of
degradation because of your father's wrongdoing.  We are simply the
innocent victims of circumstances over which we have no control; and,
Dorrie, you and I will so live that all who know us will be compelled
to respect us for ourselves."

Dorothy heaved a deep sigh of relief as her mother concluded, and her
somber eyes brightened perceptibly.  She sat silently thinking for f
several minutes; then a cloud again darkened her face.

"Mamma," she began hesitatingly, "you said the law would give p--him
the right to do as he pleases--to marry that woman.  Can you do as you
please?  Could you----"

"Oh, hush, Dorothy!" gasped the tortured wife, in a shocked tone, and
laying an icy hand over the girl's lips.  "When I married your father,"
she went on more calmly after a little, "I promised to be true to him
while we both lived, and you must never think of anything like that for
me--never--_never_!  He may choose another, but I----  Oh, God, my
burden is heavier than I can bear!"

Helen Hungerford buried her agonized face in her hands, cowering and
shrinking from the repulsive suggestion as if she had been smitten with
a lash.

Dorothy was shocked by the effect of her thoughtless question.  She had
never seen her mother so unnerved before.

"Oh, mamma, don't!" she cried wildly.  "I love you dearly--dearly--I
did not mean to hurt you so, and I _hate_ him for making you so
wretched--for putting this dreadful disgrace upon us both.  I will
never forgive him--I never want to see him again.  I know it is wicked
to hate, but I can't help it--I don't care!  I do--I do----"

These incoherent utterances ended in a piercing shriek as the
overwrought girl threw herself prone upon the floor at her mother's
feet, in a violent paroxysm of hysteria.

She was a sensitively organized child, proud as a young princess, and
possessed of a high sense of honor; and grief over the threatened break
in the family, together with fear of the opprobrium which she believed
it would entail upon her idolized mother, as well as upon herself, had
been preying upon her mind for several weeks; and now the climax had
come, the cloud had burst, and, with the strenuous excitement and
experiences of the day, had resulted in this nervous collapse.

Hours elapsed before Helen succeeded in soothing her into any degree of
calmness, and when at last she fell into a deep sleep, from utter
exhaustion, the forsaken wife found something very like hatred surging
within her own heart toward the faithless man who had ruthlessly
wrecked their happiness.

"Neither will I forgive him for imposing this lifelong sorrow and taint
upon my child," she secretly vowed as she sat through the long, lonely
hours of the night, and watched beside the couch of her daughter.

In due time, she received formal announcement that her husband had
secured his divorce, and that she also was free, by the decree of the
court; and, following close upon this verdict, came the news that John
Hungerford, the artist, had gone abroad again to resume his studies in
Paris.

It was significant, too, at least to Helen, that the same papers
stating this fact also mentioned that the Wells Opera Company, which
had just finished a most successful season in San Francisco, was booked
for a long engagement, with Madam Marie Duncan as leading soprano, in
the same city; the opening performance was set for a date in the near
future.


Helen Gregory Appleton was the only child of cultured people, who,
possessing a moderate fortune, had spared no pains or expense to give
their daughter a thorough education, with the privilege of cultivating
whatever accomplishments she preferred, or talent that she possessed.

Helen was an exceptionally bright girl, and, having conscientiously
improved her opportunities, she had graduated from high school at the
age of seventeen, and from a popular finishing school at twenty, a
beautiful and accomplished young woman, the joy and pride of her
devoted parents, who anticipated for her not only a brilliant social
career, but also an auspicious settlement in life.

Her only hobby throughout her school life had been music, of which,
from childhood, she had been passionately fond.  "I don't care for
drawing or painting," she affirmed, "so I will stick to music, and try
to do one thing well."  And with no thought of ever making it a
profession, but simply for love of it, she had labored tirelessly to
acquire proficiency in this accomplishment, with the result that she
not only excelled as a pianist, but was also a pleasing
vocalist--attainments which, later in life, were destined to bring her
rich returns for her faithful study.

It was during her last year in school that she had met John Hungerford,
a graduate of Yale College, and a promising young man, possessing great
personal attractions.  He was bright, cheerful, and witty, always
looking for the humorous side of life; while, being of an easy-going
temperament, he avoided everything like friction in his intercourse
with others, which made him a very harmonious and much-sought-after
companion.  Naturally courteous, genial, and quick at repartee,
enthusiastically devoted to athletic sports, ever ready to lead in a
frolic and to entertain lavishly, he was generally voted an "all-around
jolly good fellow."  Hence he had early become a prime favorite with
his class, and also with the faculty, and remained such throughout his
course.

He was not a brilliant scholar, however, and barely succeeded in
winning his degree at the end of his four years' term.  He did not love
study; he lacked application and tenacity of purpose, except in sports,
or such things as contributed to his personal entertainment.  At the
same time, he had too much pride to permit him to fail to secure his
diploma, and he managed to win out; but with just as little work and
worry as possible.

The only direction in which he had ever shown a tendency to excel was
in art, the love of which he had inherited from his paternal
grandfather, who, in his day, had won some renown, both abroad and in
his own country, as a landscape painter; and from early boyhood "John
Hungerford, Second"--his namesake--had shown unmistakable talent in the
same direction.

Possessing a small fortune, which had fallen to him from this same
relative, the young man had given scarcely a serious thought to his
future.

Life had always been a bright gala day to him; money was easy, friends
were plenty, and, with perfect health, what more could he ask of the
years to come?  And when questioned regarding what business or
profession he purposed to follow, on leaving college, he would reply,
with his usual irresponsible manner: "It will be time enough to decide
that matter later on.  I propose to see something of the world, and
have some fun, before settling down to the humdrum affairs of life."

Once the formality of their introduction was over, John had proceeded
forthwith to fall desperately in love with beautiful Helen Appleton,
and, as she reciprocated his affection, an early engagement had
followed.  Six months later they were married, and sailed for Europe,
with the intention of making an extensive tour abroad.

Helen's parents had not sanctioned this hurried union without
experiencing much anxiety and doubt regarding the wisdom of giving
their idolized daughter to one whom they had known for so short a time.
But young Hungerford's credentials had appeared to be unquestionable,
his character above reproach, his personality most winning, and his
means ample; thus there had seemed no reasonable objection to the
marriage.

The young man's wooing had been so eager, and Helen so enamored of her
handsome lover, who swept before him every argument or obstacle
calculated to retard the wedding with such plausible insistence, that
the important event had been consummated almost before they could
realize what it might mean to them all when the excitement and glamour
had worn away.

Frequent letters came to them from the travelers, filled with loving
messages, with enthusiastic descriptions of their sight-seeing, and
expressions of perfect happiness in each other; and the fond father and
mother, though lonely without their dear one, comforted themselves with
assurances that all was well with her, and they would soon have her
back with them again.

After spending a year in travel and sight-seeing, the young couple
drifted back to Paris, from which point they intended, after John had
made another round of the wonderful art galleries, which had enthralled
him upon their previous visit, to proceed directly home.  But the
artist element in him became more and more awakened, as, day after day,
he studied the world-renowned treasures all about him, until he
suddenly conceived the idea of making art his profession and life work;
whereupon, he impulsively registered himself for a course in oils,
under a popular artist and teacher, Monsieur Jacques by name.

Helen would have preferred to return to her parents, for she yearned
for familiar scenes, and particularly for her mother at this time; but
she yielded her will to her husband's, and they made a pretty home for
themselves in an attractive suburb of Paris, where, a little later,
there came to the young wife, in her exile--for such it almost seemed
to her--a great joy.

A little daughter, the Dorothy of our opening chapter, was born to John
and Helen Hungerford a few weeks after the anniversary of their
marriage; and, being still deeply in love with each other, it seemed to
them as if their cup of happiness was filled to the brim.

Shortly afterward, however, with only a few days between the two sad
events, cable messages brought the heartbreaking tidings that Helen's
father and mother had both been taken from her, and the blow, for the
time, seemed likely to crush her.

John, in his sympathy for his wife, was for immediately throwing up his
work, and taking her directly home; but Helen, more practical and less
impulsive than her husband, reasoned that there was nothing to be
gained by such a rash move, while much would have to be sacrificed in
forfeiting his course of lessons, which had been paid for in advance;
while she feared that such an interruption would greatly abate his
enthusiasm, if it did not wholly discourage him from the task of
perfecting himself in his studies.

She knew that her father's lawyer, who had been his adviser for many
years, was amply qualified to settle Mr. Appleton's business; and,
having unbounded confidence in him, she felt that whatever would be
required of her could be done as well by correspondence as by her
personal presence.  Consequently it was decided best to remain where
they were until John should become well grounded in his profession, and
able to get on without a teacher.

But when Mr. Appleton's affairs were settled it was learned that the
scant sum of five thousand dollars was all that his daughter would
inherit from his estate.  This unlooked-for misfortune was a great
surprise to the young husband and wife; a bitter disappointment, also,
particularly to John Hungerford, who had imagined, when he married her,
that Helen would inherit quite a fortune from her father, who, it was
generally believed, had amassed a handsome property.

Helen very wisely decided that the five thousand dollars must be put
aside for Dorothy's future education, and she directed the lawyer to
invest the money for the child, as his best judgment dictated, and
allow the interest to accumulate until they returned to America.

Three years slipped swiftly by after this, and during this time John,
who seemed really to love his work, gave promise of attaining
proficiency, if not fame, in his profession.  At least, Monsieur
Jacques, who appeared to take a deep interest in his student's
progress, encouraged him to believe he could achieve something worth
while in the future, provided he applied himself diligently to that end.

Helen, though chastened and still grieving sorely over the loss of her
parents, was happy and content to live very quietly, keeping only one
servant, and herself acting the part of nurse for Dorothy.  Before her
marriage she had supposed John to be the possessor of considerable
wealth, and this belief had been confirmed during their first year
abroad by his lavish expenditure.  He had spared no expense to
contribute to her pleasure, had showered expensive gifts upon her, and
gratified every whim of his own.  But when her father's estate had been
settled he had betrayed deep disappointment and no little anxiety in
view of the small amount coming to Helen; and it had finally come out
that his own fortune had been a very moderate one, the greater portion
of which had been consumed during their extravagant honeymoon.

This startling revelation set Helen to thinking very seriously.  She
realized that the limited sum remaining to them would have to be
carefully husbanded, or they would soon reach the end of their
resources.  John's studies were expensive, and it might be some time
yet before he could expect to realize from his profession an income
that could be depended upon, while, never yet having denied himself
anything he wanted, he had no practical idea of economy.

At length he sold a few small pictures, which, with some help in
touching up from monsieur, were very creditable to him.  But instead of
being elated that his work was beginning to attract attention and be
appreciated, he was greatly chagrined at the prices he received for
them, and allowed himself to become somewhat discouraged in view of
these small returns; and, during his fourth year, it became evident
that his interest was waning, and he was growing weary of his work.

He had never been a systematic worker, much to the annoyance of his
teacher, who was rigidly methodical and painstaking in every detail.
John would begin a subject which gave promise of being above the
ordinary, and work well upon it for a while; but after a little it
would pall upon his fancy, and be set aside to try something else,
while Monsieur Jacques would look on with grave disapproval, and often
sharply criticize such desultory efforts.  This, of course, caused
strained relations between teacher and student, and conditions drifted
from bad to worse, until he began to absent himself from the studio; at
first for only a day in the week; then, as time went on, he grew more
and more irregular, and sometimes several days would elapse during
which he would do nothing at his easel, while no one seemed to know
where, or with whom, he was spending his time.

Monsieur Jacques was very forbearing.  He knew the young man possessed
rare talent, if not real genius; he believed there was the promise of a
great artist in him, and he was ambitious to have him make his mark in
the world.  He was puzzled by his peculiar moods and behavior, and
strove in various ways to arouse his waning enthusiasm.  He knew
nothing of his circumstances, except that he had a lovely wife and
child, of whom he appeared to be very fond and proud, and he believed
him to be possessed of ample means, for he spent money freely upon
himself and his fellow students, with whom he was exceedingly popular;
hence he was wholly unable to account for his growing indifference and
indolence, unless there were some secret, subtle influence that was
leading him astray--beguiling him from his high calling.

Two years more passed thus, and still he had made no practical
advancement.  He worked by fits and starts, but rarely completed and
sold anything, even though everything he attempted was, as far as
developed, alive with brilliant possibilities.

Helen had also realized, during this time, that something was very
wrong with her husband.  He was often away from home during the
evening, and had little to say when she questioned him regarding his
absence; sometimes he told her he had been at the theater with the
boys, or he had been bowling at the club, or having a game of whist at
the studio.

She was very patient; she believed in him thoroughly, and not a
suspicion arose in her loyal heart that he would tell her a falsehood
to conceal any wrongdoing on his part.

But one night he did not return at all; at least, it was early morning
before he came in, and, not wishing to disturb his wife, he threw
himself, half dressed, upon the couch in the library, where Helen found
him, in a deep sleep, when she came downstairs in the morning.  She
appeared relieved on seeing him, and stood for a minute or two
curiously searching his face, noting how weary and haggard he looked
after his night of evident dissipation, while the odor of wine was
plainly perceptible in his heavy breathing.

Her heart was very sore, but she was careful not to wake him, for she
felt he needed to sleep, and she presently moved away from him,
gathering up the light overcoat he had worn the previous evening, and
which he had heedlessly thrown in a heap upon a chair on removing it.
She gently shook out the wrinkles, preparatory to putting the garment
away in its place, when something bright, hanging from an inner pocket,
caught her eye.

With the color fading from her face, she drew it forth and gazed at it
as one dazed.

It was a long, silken, rose-hued glove, that exhaled a faint odor of
attar of roses as it slipped from its hiding place.  It was almost new,
yet the shape of the small hand that had worn it was plainly
discernible, while on one of the rounded finger tips there was a slight
stain, like a drop of wine.

To whom did the dainty thing belong?  How had it come into her
husband's possession?  Had it been lost by some one returning from a
ball, or the opera, and simply been found by him?  Or had it some more
significant connection with the late hours and carousal of the previous
night and of many other nights?

A hundred questions and cruel suspicions flashed thick and fast through
her mind and stung her to the quick, as she recalled the many evenings
he had spent away from her of late, and his evasive replies whenever
she had questioned him regarding his whereabouts.

She shivered as she stood there, almost breathless, with that creepy,
slippery thing that seemed almost alive, and a silent, mocking witness
to some tantalizing mystery, in her hand.

What should she do about it?  Should she wake John, show him what she
had found, and demand an explanation from him?  Or would it be wiser to
return the glove to its place of concealment, say nothing, and bide her
time for further developments?

She had never been a dissembler.  As a girl, she was artless and
confiding, winning and keeping friends by her innate sincerity.  As a
wife, she had been absolutely loyal and trustful--never before having
entertained the slightest doubt of her husband's faithfulness to her.
Could she now begin to lead a double life, begin to be suspicious of
John, to institute a system of espionage upon his actions and pursuits,
and thus create an ever-increasing barrier between them?  The thought
was utterly repulsive to her, and yet it might perhaps be as well not
to force, for a time, at least, a situation which perchance would ere
long be unfolded to her without friction or estrangement.

She glanced from the rose-hued thing in her hand to the sleeper on the
couch, stood thoughtfully studying his face for a moment; then she
silently slipped the glove into the pocket where she had found it,
dropped the coat back in a heap upon the chair, and stole noiselessly
from the room.


Another year slipped by, with no change for the better in the domestic
conditions of the Hungerfords.  When he felt like it, John would work
at his easel; when he did not, he would dawdle his time away at his
club, or about town, with companions whom, Helen began to realize, were
of no advantage to him, to say the least.  Meantime, his money was fast
melting away, and there seemed to be no prospect of a reliable income
from his art.

Helen became more and more anxious regarding their future, and often
implored her husband to finish some of his pictures, try to get them
hung at different exhibitions, and in this way perhaps find a market
for them.

He was never really unkind to her, though often irritable; yet he was
far from being the devoted husband he had been during the first three
or four years of their married life.  He would often make fair promises
to do better, and perhaps work well for a while; then, his interest
flagging again, he would drop back into his indolent ways, and go on as
before.

One morning, just as he was leaving the house, John informed his wife
that he was going, with several other artists, to visit a noted château
a few miles out of Paris, where there was a wonderful collection of
paintings, comprising several schools of art, some of the oldest and
best masters being represented; and the owner of these treasures, the
Duc de Mouvel, had kindly given them permission to examine them and
take notes at their leisure.  It was a rare opportunity, he told her,
and she was not to be anxious about him if he did not reach home until
late in the evening.

Helen was quite elated by this information; it seemed to indicate that
John still loved his art, and she hoped that his enthusiasm would be
newly aroused by this opportunity to study such priceless pictures, and
he would resume his work with fresh zeal upon his return.

She was very happy during the day, refreshing herself with these
sanguine hopes, and did not even feel troubled that John did not come
back at all that night.  The owner of the château had probably extended
his hospitality, and given the students another day to study his
pictures, she thought.

The third day dawned, and still her husband had not returned; neither
had he sent her any message explaining his protracted absence.

Unable longer to endure the suspense, Helen went in town, to the
studio, hoping that Monsieur Jacques might be able to give her some
information regarding the expedition to the Château de Mouvel.

But her heart sank the moment she came into the artist's presence.

He greeted her most cordially, but searched her face curiously; then
gravely inquired:

"And where is Monsieur Hungerford, madame?  I hope not ill?  For a week
now his brushes they have been lying idle."

"A week!" repeated Helen, with an inward shock of dismay.  "Then,
Monsieur Jacques, you know nothing about the excursion to the château
of le Duc de Mouvel?"

"Excursion to the galleries of le Duc de Mouvel!" exclaimed the artist,
astonished.  "But surely I know nothing of such a visit--no, madame."

Helen explained more at length, and mentioned the names of some of
those whom John had said were to be of the party.

Her companion's brow contracted in a frown of mingled sorrow and
displeasure.

"I know nothing of it," he reiterated; "and the persons madame has
named are dilettante--they are 'no good,' as you say in America.  They
waste time--they have a love for wine, women, and frolic; and it is
regrettable that monsieur finds pleasure in their company."

Helen sighed; her heart was very heavy.

"Monsieur is one natural artist," the master resumed, bending a
compassionate gaze on her white face; "born with talent and the love of
art.  He has the true eye for color, outline, perspective; the free,
steady, skillful hand.  He would do great work with the stable mind,
but--pardon, madame--he is what, in English, you call--lazy.  He will
not exercise the necessary application.  To make the great artist there
must be more, much more, than mere talent, the love of the beautiful,
and skillful wielding of the brush; there must be the will to work,
work, work.  Ah, if madame could but inspire monsieur with
ambition--real enthusiasm--to accomplish something, to finish his
pictures, he might yet win fame for himself; but the indifference, the
indolence, the lack of moral responsibility, and the love of
pleasure--ah, it all means failure!"

"But--the Duc de Mouvel--is there such a man?  Has he a rare
collection?" faltered Helen, thus betraying her suspicion that her
husband had deceived her altogether regarding the motive of his absence.

"Yes, my child; I have the great pleasure of acquaintance with le Duc
de Mouvel," kindly returned Monsieur Jacques, adding: "He is a great
connoisseur in, and a generous patron of, all that is best in art; and
if he has extended to your husband and his friends an invitation to
view the wonderful pictures in his magnificent château at ---- they
have been granted a rare honor and privilege."

In her heart, Helen doubted that they had ever been the recipients of
such an invitation; she believed it all a fabrication to deceive her
and perhaps others.  It was a humiliating suspicion; but it forced
itself upon her and thrust its venomed sting deep into her soul.

"If there is anything I can do for madame at any time, I trust she will
not fail to command me," Monsieur Jacques observed, with gentle
courtesy, and breaking in upon the troubled reverie into which she had
fallen.

Helen lifted her sad eyes to his.

"I thank you, monsieur," she gratefully returned.  "You are--you always
have been--most kind and patient."  Then, glancing searchingly around
the room, the walls of which were covered with beautiful paintings, she
inquired: "Are there any of Mr. Hungerford's pictures here?"

"Ah!  Madame would like to see some of the work monsieur has been doing
of late?" said the artist alertly, and glad to change the subject, for
he saw that his proffered kindness had well-nigh robbed her of her
composure.  "Come this way, if you please, and I will show you," he
added, turning to leave the room.

He led her through a passage to a small room in the rear of the one
they had just left; and, some one coming to speak to him just then,
excusing himself, he left her there to look about at her leisure.

This was evidently John's private workroom; but it was in a very dusty
and untidy condition, and Helen was appalled to see the many unfinished
subjects which were standing against the walls, in the windows, and
even upon chairs.  Some were only just begun; others were well under
way, and it would have required but little time and effort to have
completed them and made them salable.

She moved slowly about the place, pausing here and there to study
various things that appealed to her, and at the same time recognizing
the unmistakable talent that was apparent in almost every stroke of the
brush.

At length she came to a small easel that had been pushed close into a
corner.  There was a canvas resting on it, with its face turned to the
wall, and curiosity prompted her to reverse it to ascertain the
subject, when a cry of surprise broke from her lips as she found
herself gazing upon the unfinished portrait of a most beautiful woman.

John had never seemed to care to do portraits--they were uninteresting,
he had always said--and she had never known of his attempting one
before; hence her astonishment.

The figure had been painted full length.  It was slight, but perfect in
its proportions; the pose exceedingly graceful and natural, the
features delicate, the coloring exquisite.  The eyes were a deep blue,
arch and coquettish in expression; the hair a glossy, waving brown, a
few bewitching locks falling softly on the white forehead, beneath a
great picture hat.  The costume was an evening gown of black spangled
net, made _décoletté_, and with only an elaborate band of jet over the
shoulders, the bare neck and beautifully molded arms making an
effective contrast against the glittering, coal-black dress.

The girl was standing by a small oval table, one hand resting lightly
upon it, the other hanging by her side, and loosely holding a pair of
long silken gloves.

Helen's face flooded crimson as her glance fell upon the gloves.  Even
though they were black, they were startlingly suggestive to her, and
her thought instantly reverted to the one, so bright-hued, which she
had found in the inner pocket of her husband's overcoat some months
previous.

Had she to-day inadvertently stumbled upon the solution of that mystery
which had never ceased to rankle, with exceeding bitterness, in her
heart from that day to this?

There was still much to be done before the picture would be finished,
though it was a good deal further along than most of its companions.
Enough had been accomplished, however, to show that there had been no
lack of interest on the part of the artist while at work upon it.

Who was she--this blue-eyed, brown-haired siren in glittering black?
When and where had the portrait been painted?  Had the woman come
there, to John's room, for sittings?  Or was she some one whom he met
often, and had painted from memory?  Helen did not believe she could be
a model; there was too much about her that hinted at high life, and of
habitual association with the fashionable world--possibly of the stage.

She stood a long time before the easel, studying every line of the
lovely face until she found that, with all its beauty, there was a
suggestion of craftiness and even cruelty in the dark-blue eyes and in
the lines about the mouth and sensuous chin.

A step behind her caused Helen to start and turn quickly, to find
Monsieur Jacques almost beside her, his eyes fastened intently, and in
unmistakable surprise, upon the picture she had discovered.

"Who is she?" she demanded, almost sharply, and voicing the query she
had just put to herself.

"Madame, I have never before looked upon the picture--I did not even
know that Monsieur Hungerford had attempted a portrait," gravely
returned the artist.  "It is finely done, however," he added
approvingly.

"Has no woman been here for sittings?"

"No, madame; no one except our own models--I am sure not.  That is not
allowed in my studio without my sanction and supervision," was the
reply.  "It may be simply a study, original with monsieur; if so, it is
very beautiful, and holds great promise," the man concluded, with
hearty appreciation.

Helen replaced the portrait as she had found it, somewhat comforted by
her companion's assurance and high praise of her husband's effort; then
she turned to leave the room.

"I thank you, monsieur, for your courtesy," she said, holding out to
him a hand that trembled visibly from inward excitement.

"Pray do not mention it, but come again, my child, whenever I can be of
service to you.  _Au revoir_," he responded kindly, as he accompanied
her to the door and bowed her out.

Helen went home with a heavy heart.  She was well-nigh discouraged with
what she had heard and seen.  She had long suspected, and she was now
beginning to realize, that her husband's chief aim in life was personal
entertainment and love of ease; that he was sadly lacking in force of
character, practical application, and moral responsibility; caring more
about being rated a jolly good fellow by his boon companions than for
his duties as a husband and father, or for attaining fame in his
profession.

Thus she spent a very unhappy day, haunted continually by that
portrait, and brooding anxiously over what the future might hold for
them; while, at the same time, she was both indignant and keenly
wounded in view of John's improvidence, prodigality, and supreme
selfishness, and of his apparent indifference to her peace of mind and
the additional burdens he was constantly imposing upon her.

John returned that evening, in a most genial mood.  He made light of
his protracted absence and of Helen's anxiety on account of it, but
offered no apologies for keeping her in suspense for so long.  He
briefly remarked that the party had concluded to extend their tour, and
make more of an outing than they had at first planned.  It had
evidently been a very enjoyable one, although he did not go into detail
at all, and when Helen inquired about the Duc de Mouvel's wonderful
collection of paintings, he appeared somewhat confused, but said they
were "grand, remarkable, and absolutely priceless!" then suddenly
changed the subject.

Helen's suspicion that the party had never been inside the Château de
Mouvel was confirmed by his manner; but she was too hurt and proud to
question him further, and so did not pursue the subject.  She thought
it only right, however, to tell him of her visit to Monsieur Jacques,
and what the artist had said about his talent, and the flattering
possibilities before him, if he would conscientiously devote himself to
his work.  She referred to his disapproval of his present course, and
the company he was keeping; whereupon John became exceedingly angry, in
view of her "meddling," as he termed it; said Monsieur Jacques would do
better to give more attention to his own affairs, and less to his;
then, refusing to discuss the situation further, he abruptly left the
room in a very sulky frame of mind.

Helen had debated with herself as to the advisability of telling him of
her discovery of the portrait.  She did not like to conceal anything
from her husband.  She felt that every such attempt only served to
establish a more formidable barrier between them; but after the
experience of to-night she thought it would be wiser not to refer to
the matter--at least until later.

John evidently did some thinking on his own part that night, for he was
more like his former self when he appeared at breakfast the next
morning, and proceeded directly to the studio on leaving the house.  He
did better for a couple of months afterward, manifested more interest
in his work, and finished a couple of pictures, which, through the
influence of Monsieur Jacques, were hung at an exhibition and sold at
fair prices, greatly to Helen's joy.

But instead of being inspired to even greater effort by this success,
John seemed content to rest upon his honors, and soon began to lapse
again into his former indolent ways, apparently indifferent to the fact
that his money was almost gone, and poverty staring himself and his
family in the face.

Long before this, Helen had given up her maid, had practiced economy in
every possible way, and denied herself many things which she had always
regarded as necessary to her comfort.  But the more she gave up, the
more John appeared to expect her to give up; the harder she worked, the
less he seemed to think he was obliged to do himself.  Thus, with her
domestic duties, her sewing, and the care of Dorothy, every moment of
the day, from the hour of rising until she retired at night, the young
wife was heavily burdened with toilsome and unaccustomed duties.

It was a bitter experience for this delicately nurtured girl, but no
word of repining ever escaped her lips.  She had pledged herself to
John "for better or worse," and, despite the unremitting strain upon
her courage, patience, and strength, despite her increasing
disappointment in and constantly waning respect for her husband, she
had no thought but to loyally abide by her choice, and share his lot,
whatever it might be.

The day came, however, when John himself awoke to the fact that he had
about reached the end of his rope--when he was startled to find that
less than two hundred dollars remained to his credit in the bank, and
poverty treading close upon his heels.  He knew he could no longer go
on in this desultory way; something radical must be done, and done at
once.  He was tired of his art; he was tired of facing, day after day,
Monsieur Jacques' grave yet well-deserved disapproval; while, for some
reason, he had become weary of Paris, and, one morning, to Helen's
great joy--for she believed it the best course to pursue--he suddenly
announced his intention to return to the United States.

They sublet their house, and were fortunate in selling their furniture,
just as it stood, to the new tenant, thus realizing sufficient funds,
with what money they already possessed, to comfortably defray all
expenses back to San Francisco, which had been their former home, and
to which Helen had firmly insisted upon returning, although John had
voiced a decided preference for New York.

"No, I am going home--to my friends," she reiterated, but with her
throat swelling painfully as she thought she would find no father and
mother there to greet her.  "I have lived in exile long enough; I
need--I am hungry to see familiar faces."

"But----" John began, with a rising flush.

"Yes, I know, we are going back poor," said his wife, reading his
thought as he hesitated; "but my real friends will not think any the
less of me for that, and they will be a comfort to me.  Besides, all
the furniture of my old home is stored there, and it will be useful to
us in beginning life again."

During the voyage Helen seemed happier than she had been for months.
The freedom from household cares and drudgery was a great boon to her,
and the rest, salt air, and change of food were doing her good; while
the anticipation of once more being among familiar scenes and faces was
cheering, even exhilarating, to her.

To Dorothy the ocean was a great marvel and delight, and it was a
pleasant sight to see the beautiful mother and her attractive little
daughter pacing the deck together, enjoying the novelty of their
surroundings, watching the white-capped waves, or the foaming trail in
the wake of the huge vessel, their bright faces and happy laughter
attracting the attention of many an appreciative observer.

John, on the contrary, was listless and moody, spending his time mostly
in reading, smoking, and sleeping in his steamer chair, apparently
taking little interest in anything that was going on about him, or
giving much thought to what was before him at his journey's end.

One morning Helen came on deck with two or three recent magazines,
which a chance acquaintance had loaned her.  She handed two of them to
her husband, and, tucking herself snugly into her own chair, proceeded
to look over the other, with Dorothy standing beside her to see the
pictures.

By and by the child ran away to play, and Helen became interested in a
story.  A half hour passed, and she had become deeply interested in the
tale she was reading, when she was startled by a smothered exclamation
from John.

She glanced at him, to find him gazing intently at a picture in one of
the magazines she had given him.  The man's face was all aglow with
admiration and pleased surprise, and she noted that the hand which held
the periodical trembled from some inward emotion.

Wondering what could have moved him so, yet feeling unaccountably
reluctant to question him, she appeared not to notice his excitement,
and composedly went on with her reading.  Presently he arose, saying he
was going aft for a smoke, and left her alone; but, to her great
disappointment, taking the magazine with him.

Later in the day, on going to their stateroom, however, she found it in
his berth, tucked under his pillow!

Eagerly seizing it, she began to search it through, when suddenly, on
turning a leaf, a great shock went quivering through her, for there on
the page before her was the picture of a woman, the exact counterpart
of the half-finished portrait she had seen in John's work-room during
her visit to Monsieur Jacques.

Like a flash, her eyes dropped to the name beneath it.

"Marie Duncan, with the Wells Opera Company, now in Australia," was
what she read.

On the opposite page was a brief account of the troupe and the musical
comedy, which, during the past season, had had an unprecedented run in
Paris, and was now making a great hit in Melbourne, Miss Duncan, the
star, literally taking the public by storm.

"Well, _that_ mystery is finally solved!  And doubtless she was the
owner of that pink glove, also," mused Helen, her lips curling with
fine scorn, as she studied the fascinating face before her.  "Thank
fortune," she presently added, with a sigh of thankfulness, as she
closed the book and replaced it under the pillow, "she is away in
Australia, and we are every day increasing the distance between us."

She kept her own counsel, however, and gave no sign of the discovery
she had made.

The day preceding their landing in New York, Helen asked her husband
what plans he had made for their future, how he expected to provide for
their support upon reaching San Francisco.

"Oh, I don't know!" he replied, somewhat irritably.  "Possibly I may
ask Uncle Nathan to give me a position in his office."

"And give up your art, John!" exclaimed Helen, in a voice of dismay,
adding: "You are better fitted for that than for anything else."

"But I shall have to do something to get a start.  You know, it takes
money to live while one is painting pictures," he moodily returned.

"But it would not take very long to finish up some of them--the best
ones; and I feel sure they would sell readily," said his wife.

"The best ones would require the help of a good teacher, or an expert
artist, to complete," her husband curtly replied.

Helen sighed regretfully over the time which had been so wantonly
wasted in Paris, and during which, under the skillful supervision of
Monsieur Jacques, he might have finished much of his work, and at the
same time perfected himself upon many important points.  She preserved
a thoughtful silence for several moments; then gravely inquired:

"Do you suppose, John, that, with another year of study, with some good
teacher, you could finish and dispose of the various subjects you have
begun?"

"Possibly I might," he briefly observed, but there was very little
enthusiasm in his tone or manner.

"Do you feel in the mood?  Have you any ambition for honest,
painstaking effort--for hard work, John, to attempt this under a
first-class artist?" Helen persisted.

The man began to grow restive; he could never bear to be pinned down to
committing himself to anything, or to yield a point.

"You have no idea, Helen, what a grind it is to sit before an easel day
after day, and wield a brush," he said, in an injured tone, and with a
frown of annoyance.

"Everything is a grind unless you put your heart into your work--unless
one is governed by principle and a sense of moral responsibility," said
Helen gravely.

"Is that the way you have baked and brewed, washed dishes and made beds
the past year?" queried her husband, with a covert sneer.

"I certainly never baked and brewed, or washed dishes, solely from love
of the work," she quietly but significantly replied, as her glance
rested upon her wrist, where a faint scar was visible--the fading
reminder of a serious burn sustained when she first began her
unaccustomed duties as cook and maid of all work.

John observed it also, then quickly looked away, as he remembered that
she had never murmured or neglected a single duty on account of it.

"But where is the money for a teacher coming from?" he inquired, after
a moment, and referring to Helen's unanswered question regarding his
unfinished work.

"You know Dorothy's money has been accumulating all these years," she
began in reply.  "The interest now amounts to upward of fifteen hundred
dollars, and I will consent to use it for this purpose, if you will
agree to do your level best to make your unfinished pictures marketable
during the coming year."

Her husband flushed hotly--not because he experienced either gratitude
or a sense of shame in view of becoming dependent upon his wife's
bounty, but because it angered him to have conditions made for him.

He appeared to be utterly devoid of ambition for his future, and
Helen's suggestion possessed no real attraction for him.  Painting had
become a bore--the last thing he had really taken any interest in
having been the portrait his wife had discovered in his studio just
previous to the sailing of its original for Australia.

John Hungerford had never performed a day's manual labor in his life,
and even though he had said he might ask his uncle for a position on
his arrival in San Francisco, he had no relish for the prospect of
buckling down to a humdrum routine of duties in Nathan Young's
flourishing manufactory.

He sat chewing the cud of sullen discontent for some time, while
considering the situation, and finally gave Helen a half-hearted
promise to stick to his art, under a teacher, for another year.  But
his consent had been so reluctantly given, his manner was so
indifferent, Helen felt that she had received very little encouragement
to warrant that the future would show any better results than the past,
and the outlook seemed rather dark to her.


Upon their arrival in San Francisco, the Hungerfords took a small
apartment in a quiet but good location, where Helen felt she could ask
her friends, and they would not hesitate to come to see her.

This she tastefully fitted up with some of the simplest of her old-home
furniture, which her father's lifelong friend and lawyer had carefully
stored for her against her return.  The more expensive pieces, with
some massive, valuable silver, and choice bric-a-brac that Mr. Appleton
had purchased to embellish the beautiful new residence which he had
built a few years previous to his death--these extravagances having
really been the beginning of his undoing--she sold, thus realizing
several hundred dollars, which would go far, with careful management,
toward tiding over the interval during which John was working to turn
his paintings into money.

As yet Dorothy had never attended school, Helen having systematically
taught her at home; but the child was bright and quick to learn, and
was fully up to the standard with, if not in advance of, girls of her
own age.  She could speak French like a Parisian, and her mother had
also given her excellent training in music.

Helen, thus far, had been very wise in her management of Dorothy.
Profiting by the mistakes which she realized her own indulgent parents
had made in rearing herself, as well as by the faults she had detected
in her husband's character, she had determined that her daughter should
not suffer in the future, along the same lines, for lack of careful
discipline.  At the same time, she by no means made her government
irksome; indeed, it never seemed to the child that she was being
governed, for the companionship between them was so close and tender
that she fell naturally into her mother's way of thinking, and seldom
rebelled against her authority, even though she was by no means devoid
of spirit or a mind of her own.

Now, however, feeling that Dorothy needed a wider horizon, with
different environment and training, as she pursued her education, her
mother decided to put her into the public school.

This would relieve Helen of much care, and also give her more time to
take up a systematic course of piano and voice culture, which she had
determined to do, with the view of turning her talent for music to some
practical purpose, at least until her husband was better equipped to
provide suitably for his family.

She had been cordially received on her return by most of her old
friends, even though she had made no secret of the change in her
circumstances.  She had been a great favorite before her marriage, and
her family highly respected; hence her reverses did not now appear to
affect her social standing, at least among those who knew her best.

Very grateful and happy in view of this proof of real friendship, Helen
was encouraged to quietly seek pupils in music, and easily secured a
class of ten, which were all she felt she could do justice to with her
domestic duties and other cares.

She felt very independent and not a little proud of the money thus
earned, while she found it a great help in meeting the many expenses of
her household.

During the first year after their return from abroad, John also worked
well.  He liked his teacher--a German, who had studied many years in
Italy--who spoke in high praise of his talent, as well as of the
thoroughness of the instruction he had received from Monsieur Jacques,
all of which was apparent in his beautiful but unfinished work, he said.

Although Herr Von Meyer was not permanently located in San Francisco,
his work had become popular, and he had quite a large following as
students.  He might almost have been called an itinerant artist, for he
had traveled extensively in the United States and Canada, stopping for
a longer or shorter time, as his fancy dictated, in numerous places,
painting and sketching American life and scenery.  He was now planning
to return to his own country at the end of another year, to again take
up work in his own studio in Berlin.

It was, therefore, a rare opportunity for John to have found so
talented a teacher just at this time; and, under his supervision, he
completed and disposed of a goodly number of his paintings.  Some of
these were so well appreciated that he received orders to duplicate
them, and the future looked promising.

This success so elated and encouraged him that at the end of a year he
concluded he was now competent to do business for himself without
further assistance or instruction.  Accordingly, he hired some rooms,
furnished them attractively, and launched out upon an independent
career with something like real enthusiasm.

For a time all went well; more pictures were painted and sold, bringing
good prices; while, after the departure of Herr Von Meyer, students
began to flock to him.  Young Hungerford, the artist, was beginning to
be talked about in society and at the various clubs; he was also much
sought after and admired in fashionable circles; his studio became a
favorite resort for people interested in art, and here John shone a
bright particular star.

Helen became happy in proportion to her husband's advancement; she grew
radiant with health; the lines of care and worry all faded out of her
face; she was like a light-hearted girl, and John told her she was
prettier than ever.

It was almost too good to be true, she sometimes said to herself, as
she remembered the sad conditions that had prevailed while they were in
Paris.  But she would not allow herself to dwell upon those unhappy
experiences; the present was full of hope and promise, and she firmly
believed that her husband's fame and fortune were assured.

Had John Hungerford possessed "the stable mind," as Monsieur Jacques
once expressed it, all must have gone well; if he had been less
egotistical, selfish, and vain, more persevering and practical; had he
not been naturally so indolent--"lazy," to quote his former teacher
again--and pleasure-loving, he might have risen rapidly, and maintained
his position.

But, as time wore on, and the novelty of his popularity and prosperity
began to pall upon him; as the demands upon his patience became
greater, and the supervision of students required more concentration
and attention to detail; as the filling of increasing orders for his
own work made it necessary to stick closer to his easel, day after day,
life began to seem "a grind" again.

He grew discontented, irritable, restless.  He lost patience with his
students, and became indifferent to his duty to them, until they began
to be disaffected, and dropped away from him.  He neglected orders
until his patrons became angry and withdrew them, and finally, becoming
dissatisfied with his own work, he dropped back into his old habit of
starting subject after subject, only to set them aside to try something
else, rarely completing anything; all of which tended toward the ruin
of his once prosperous business, as well as his reputation as an artist.

All this came about so gradually that, for a long time, no one save
Helen suspected how matters were going.  She begged him to wake up and
renew his efforts, both for her sake and Dorothy's, as well as for his
own; and she encouraged him in every possible way.  But nothing that
she could say or do served to arouse him from the mental and moral
lethargy that possessed and grew upon him.

Fortunately, in spite of their recent prosperity, Helen had retained
her pupils in music, more because of her love for the work than because
she felt the need of money, as at first.  Thus, when her husband's
income began to fall off, she dropped, little by little, into the way
of sharing the household expenses from her own earnings, and so assumed
burdens which he should have borne himself.

As month succeeded month, things continued to grow worse, until rumors
of the truth got afloat, and his friends and patrons began to show
their disapproval of his downward course, and even to shun his society.

Yet these significant omens did not serve to arouse him.  On the
contrary, his indifference and indolence increased, and his old love
for wandering returned; his studio would frequently be closed for days,
sometimes for weeks, at a time, and only his boon companions knew where
he could be found.

Helen regarded these evidences of deterioration with a sinking heart,
yet tried to be patient.  She did not complain, even when their funds
ran very low, but cheerfully supplied the needs of the family, and
bravely tried to fortify herself with the hope that John could not long
remain oblivious to his responsibilities, and would eventually retrieve
himself.

During all this time she had been making splendid progress in her own
musical training--especially in the cultivation of her voice.  She had
often given her services in behalf of charitable entertainments, and
not infrequently assisted her friends to entertain by singing a
charming group of songs at parties and receptions; thus she had gained
for herself the reputation of being a most pleasing vocalist.

Recently these same friends, who sympathized with her domestic trials,
and, recognizing her financial difficulties, had arranged for several
musical functions, asking her to superintend them, and had paid her
liberally for her services.

This new departure seemed to Helen like the pointing of Providence to a
more promising future, by making her entirely independent of her
husband, and it would also enable her to give Dorothy advantages which
she could never hope--judging from present indications--to receive from
her father.  Accordingly, she immediately issued attractive cards,
advertising to provide musical entertainment for clubs, receptions, or
social functions of any kind.

It was somewhat late in the season when she conceived this project, and
she secured only a limited number of engagements; but as she gained
fresh laurels and had delighted her patrons in every instance, she
believed she had paved the way for a good business by the following
fall.

During the month of May of this year John began to talk of going out of
town for the summer.

"We cannot afford it," Helen objected.  "My pupils will leave me in
June, and will not return to me until September, and we must not spend
the money it would cost for such an outing."

"But you need a change, as well as I, and--and some of--of Dorothy's
money would be well spent in giving us all a good vacation," her
husband argued.

"That money is not to be touched," said Helen firmly.  "That is
sacredly devoted to a college course for her as soon as she leaves the
high school.  Dorothy and I are perfectly well; we have more comforts
at home than we could find elsewhere without paying an extravagant
price, and, with a short trip now and then, to some point of interest,
we can manage to be very happy without going away."

"We could go into the mountains, and camp out--that wouldn't cost very
much," John persisted.

"Camp out!" Helen exclaimed, astonished.  "And where would we get our
meals?  You know very well that Hannah would not put up with the poor
accommodations of any camp."

"Oh, dismiss Hannah for a couple of months!  We could get our own
meals, and make them as simple as we chose," her husband suggested.

Helen smiled wanly.  She wondered what he meant by simple meals, for he
was, as a rule, very particular what he had to eat and how it was
cooked.  She realized that such a move would result in simply making
her a drudge, under very uncomfortable conditions, for the summer; she
would lose a good maid, and be in no way refreshed on her return to
town.

"I think it would be very unwise," she gravely returned; "such an
outing as that would have no rest or attraction for me; besides, I had
planned to work diligently at my music during the next three months, to
prepare for the winter."

John was not at all pleased with this decided rejection of his
proposition, as a protracted and sullen silence plainly indicated.

"Well, _I_ am not willing to swelter in the hot city during the next
three months, if you are," heat length burst forth, "and I want a
change."

"Oh, John, you ought to stay right here, and go to work for your
family," said his wife, with a note of appeal in her tremulous tones.
"We have hardly money enough left to pay our bills until fall, as it
is."

"I tell you I will not!" he said crossly, adding: "You can, of course,
do as you choose.  If you and Dorothy will not go with me, I'll turn
Bohemian, take my kit along, and make sketches for work when I return."

Helen knew it would be useless to oppose him, so said no more.  All the
same, judging from the past, she had little faith that his sketching
would amount to much, and so when June opened she saw him depart with a
heavy heart.

She received brief letters from him from time to time; but he told her
very little of what he was doing.  His chief desire seemed to be to let
her know where her letters and remittances would reach him.

He returned in September, to find his wife and child blooming and
happy.  It was evident that they had enjoyed the summer far better than
he, for he appeared jaded and spiritless, while he had very little to
produce as material for the coming winter's work--a few rough sketches,
carelessly done, were all he had to show.

Helen, however, had worked to good purpose.  Her voice was in splendid
condition.  She had added several choice selections to her repertoire;
while Dorothy showed marked improvement upon the piano, and had learned
to accompany her mother very effectively in some of her simpler songs.
But it had not been all work and no play with them.  They went out
somewhere every fine day.  They had little picnics to the park; they
had sails upon the bay, sometimes visiting a popular resort; and once
an old friend of Helen's asked them, for a week, to her summer home, a
few miles out of the city.  Dorothy was perfectly satisfied, even
though most of her school friends were away, and once remarked to a
friend who called upon them: "Mamma and I do have just the nicest times
together; it's great fun to go about with her."

John had very little to say relative to his own vacation, or the
companions with whom he had spent it; he certainly gave no sign of
renewed vigor, and showed no inclination to take up his long-neglected
painting; but Helen asked no questions, made no comments or criticisms.
Neither did she manifest either surprise or disapproval when he came in
one day, a month after his return, and informed her that he had given
up his studio and accepted a position in his Uncle Nathan's
establishment.

"Painting pictures, as a business, is fluctuating, monotonous,
unsatisfactory," he said.  "He believed it would be far better to have
a salary, on which he could depend."

Helen sighed for the money that had been wasted in rent for the studio
during the summer; also for the rejected art for which John possessed
talent, if not genius.  But he lacked force, he hated personal
responsibility, as well as work, and perhaps the salary, even though it
was to be a moderate sum for the first year, would be better.  The
monthly payments from Mr. Young could be relied upon, and thus her own
burdens would be somewhat lightened.


Helen had entered three new pupils on her books at the beginning of the
fall, these increasing her class to thirteen, and she had also been
engaged, for an early date in October, to sing at a charity fair, to be
held under the auspices of one of the wealthy clubs of the city.  This
seemed quite a promising outlook so early in the season, and she was
also hoping much from her new venture as entertainer at private social
functions.

The fair was extensively advertised, and was held for four afternoons
and evenings of the second week in October, Helen appearing twice upon
each occasion, and proving such a drawing card that a score of
engagements for fashionable receptions was the result of her success.

This was far more than she had dared to expect, and she was much elated
over her good fortune.  Everything moved along peacefully and
prosperously until spring, John bearing his confinement in his uncle's
office better than she had anticipated, and was apparently content with
his salary.  But as the warm weather came on again she could see that
he began to chafe under his confinement in the city and to his work.
He had his vacation of two weeks in August, however, when he made a
trip to Chicago, instead of going into the country, greatly to his
wife's astonishment at the time.  On his return he seemed in high
spirits, saying he had had a fine trip, and resumed his duties with
apparent cheerfulness.

A week later there appeared upon the billboards about the city flaring
advertisements stating that the Wells Opera Company, with beautiful
Marie Duncan as star, would present the "Prince of Pilsen" early in
October.  The newspapers also contained notices of the same fact, and
stated that Miss Duncan had just concluded a summer engagement in
Chicago, and was now resting for a few weeks before taking up her work
in San Francisco.

At once Helen understood John's motive in going to Chicago to spend his
vacation; also his unusual cheerfulness upon his return; and a
foreboding of impending trouble began to haunt her from that moment.

When the Wells Opera Company arrived, Helen made it a point to attend a
matinee, to ascertain for herself what the personality of the popular
favorite was like.

That she was exceedingly beautiful and peculiarly fascinating there was
no denying, and her voice was a marvel of sweetness.

John had never painted anything more true to life than the portrait she
had discovered in his studio in Paris; although, if that were possible,
the siren's charms were riper and even more alluring than at that time.

Nevertheless, there was a vein of coarseness in her manner, a boldness
in her glance and smile, a voluptuous abandon in her acting, that
offended and repelled Helen's finer sensibilities, and sent her home
sick at heart, with mingled fear and jealousy; for, down deep in her
consciousness, she was forced to acknowledge that it was just these
elements in Marie Duncan that appealed to something of the same nature
in her husband's character, and was winning him from his allegiance to
his wife.

She wondered what had become of that portrait.  She had never seen it
since that never-to-be-forgotten day when she had visited Monsieur
Jacques in such distress, to seek some explanation of John's prolonged
absence from home.

John certainly had not brought it back to America with him.  Whither
had it disappeared?  Had he destroyed it, fearing it might some time
betray him?

Suddenly her outraged heart awoke to the truth, and her face flamed
hotly with indignation and humiliation as she recalled the reproduction
she had seen in the magazine she had found under John's pillow in his
berth on the steamer, as they were returning from France.

John had finished his picture; he had given it to the actress before
she sailed for Australia, and she had allowed it to be copied by the
press.

It seemed to Helen that her cup of woe was filled to the brim--her
endurance taxed to the limit, as she began to query within herself what
would be the outcome of Marie Duncan's present engagement in San
Francisco.  But the courage that is born in heroes had also been
planted in Helen Hungerford's heart, and, after the first shock of
dismay had passed, she began to ask what she could do to counteract
Marie's influence and keep her husband loyal to her and true to
himself.  To reveal her suspicions, to voice complaints, criticisms, or
reproaches would only serve to make matters worse; for John was one who
would never bear censure or opposition in any form.  Her only hope lay
in being tactful and diplomatic, in trying to make herself and their
home so attractive that he would be weaned from his infatuation for the
opera star, and realize the folly of ruining his reputation and
domestic peace.

So she bravely resolved to conceal every evidence of anxiety.  John was
in absolute ignorance of the fact that she even dreamed of his interest
in the actress, and she realized the wisdom of still concealing it from
him.  She said nothing of her afternoon at the matinee; she never
referred to the opera, or expressed a desire to see it; neither did her
husband invite her to go, as was usual whenever anything new, of a
musical nature, was running; but she began a systematic course of
acting herself, using every possible device to keep him with his
family, catering to his tastes and humoring his lightest wish or whim.
She asked him to be her escort to and from the social functions at
which she was entertaining; she planned pleasures that would include
them all, and tried to interest him in books she was reading.

But all was of no avail.  He always had some plausible excuse to get
away from home evenings, and often did not return until the small hours
of the morning; he manifested less and less interest in his family; he
was morose and preoccupied, avoiding conversation, and at times was
exceedingly irritable with Dorothy.

Previous to this, since he had been in his uncle's employ, he had
cheerfully contributed a part of his salary to help defray household
expenses; but now he suddenly began to withhold his money, or, if
reminded that funds were needed, doled out a mere pittance so
grudgingly that Helen shrank from the humiliation of asking assistance
and being so inconsiderately treated.

This state of things continued far into the winter, the breach between
the man and his family continually widening, for Dorothy was beginning
to take notice, while he began to be irregular at his business and to
show the effect of late hours and dissipation.

One afternoon, on returning from an engagement at an out-of-town
reception, Helen found, to her great surprise, Mr. Nathan Young, John's
uncle and employer, awaiting her.  It was the first time she had seen
him for many months, for, aside from his one act of giving her husband
his present position, he had never manifested the slightest interest in
the family.

He was rated a very rich man, but, having a fashionable wife and four
daughters to maintain, he was wholly absorbed in his business and
individual responsibilities.

Helen had never been asked to entertain at any of Madam Young's
receptions, although she had sent her, early in the season, a card
announcing her intentions; neither had she ever met any of the family
in the homes of her patrons; and now, when, after greeting her visitor
with graceful courtesy, she threw aside her wrap and stood before him
in her fresh young beauty and charming costume, the man stared at her
in astonishment.

"Really, Mrs. John Hungerford, you look like the wife of a
millionaire," he brusquely observed, a note of keen irony in his tones.

Helen flushed consciously.

She realized that she must appear extravagantly attired to one who did
not understand the situation.  The next moment she smiled frankly up
into her companion's face.

"Perhaps you do not know, Mr. Young, that, for two years, I have been
singing at social functions given by fashionable people, to help John
meet the expenses of the family?" she explained.

"No, I didn't know it," he curtly returned, his shrewd eyes still
studying her costume.

"Of course," Helen went on, "going before such audiences, I am obliged
to dress well; but"--with an air of quiet dignity, for she felt that
the man was rude to her--"as I earn all my own clothes, as well as
Dorothy's, I am wronging no one."

"Humph!" Nathan Young grunted, although his glance softened; for truly
Helen was very pleasant to look upon as she stood before him in her
trailing gown of soft blue silk, tastefully trimmed with real lace that
had belonged to her mother; she also wore some fine jewels which had
come to her from the same source, and the man, now that he
comprehended, secretly liked her spirit and frankness in telling him
just how matters stood.

She showed a turn for business that pleased him, and he chuckled within
himself over her statement that she earned all her own and Dorothy's
clothes.  Money getting had been his one aim from his youth up; he
liked to see people work hard for money; he had no patience with
drones.  He had always viewed John's idiotic dabbling in paints with
undisguised contempt, and had never shown the least interest in his
career as an artist.

Presently he broke forth, almost sharply:

"Where is that husband of yours?"

"John?  Hasn't he been at the office to-day?" Helen inquired, in a
startled tone.

"I've seen nothing of him for nearly a week," the gentleman replied,
with a frown of displeasure.

"You have not seen John for nearly a week!" repeated the astonished
wife, aghast.

"That is what I said," was the curt rejoinder.  "And this isn't the
first time he has neglected his business, by any means, though he has
never stayed away so long before.  I'm tired of his shilly-shallying,
and he has always worked with an air of protest, as if he felt the
position beneath him.  I just dropped in to see if he were ill, or had
any good reason to offer for his absence."

"No, John is perfectly well, and I am amazed at what you have told me,
Mr. Young," Helen observed, with tremulous lips, her composure sadly
shaken.

The man arose, an ominous gleam in his eyes.

"Well, then, you can tell him from me that he need not show up at the
office again," he coldly observed, at the same time laying an envelope
on the table before Helen.  "Here is his pay up to the end of the
month.  He hasn't earned it, but it's what I agreed to give him, and
I'm a man of my word.  I hoped," he continued, less sharply, after a
momentary pause, during which his glance fell upon his companion's
colorless face, "when he came to me for a position he had given up his
nonsense about art, and had made up his mind to settle down to
something worth while, and I meant to do well by him--take him in with
me, by and by, perhaps, if he showed any backbone or interest in the
business; but it is evident that he cares more for his own ease and
pleasure than for anything else, and--I'm through with him."

Helen's heart sank within her.  She dare not think what might be the
consequences if John lost his position just at this time.  It would
leave him with no responsibility, and with nothing to do but to dance
attendance upon Marie Duncan.

She felt it would mean utter ruin for their domestic happiness.  He
might not mend his ways even if his uncle retained him in his service,
since his infatuation for the actress had become so strong; but it
would at least be something to hold him from spending all his time with
her.  To be suddenly cut off like this seemed like the parting asunder
of the cable that held their only anchor of hope, thus leaving them
drifting helplessly upon a treacherous sea.

"Oh, pray do not say that, Mr. Young!" she pleaded, with whitening
lips.  "John needs to be encouraged, to be held by some responsibility.
Will you not kindly give him another trial?"

"No, I have borne all I shall from him," gruffly replied Nathan Young,
but shifting uneasily under the look in her imploring eyes.  "John has
no sense of responsibility, no idea of duty in connection with himself
or any one else.  His only thought is to drift comfortably with the
current; when there is any rowing to be done he thrusts it upon some
one else every time.  I've been studying him ever since he came to me,
and I know.  He will never be 'held,' as you put it, except by his own
will--at least, until he has had some lesson in life that will make a
stronger impression upon him than any he has had yet.  There, I've had
my say!  It has taken me longer to make up my mind to this, perhaps,
than you have any idea, for he was my sister's boy, and I owed her
something; but when I finally come to a decision about anything the
matter is settled.  I am sorry for you, though, Mrs. Hungerford--upon
my word, I am.  I don't believe it has been easy navigating for you, in
spite of the brave front you show to the world," he concluded, with a
touch of honest sympathy, while he wondered if she had any suspicion of
how or where her husband was spending the most of his time.

He had been investigating the movements of his recreant nephew of late,
and he had learned that his companions and pursuits were not at all to
his credit.

Helen stood cold and haughty before him.  She was stung to the quick by
the man's harsh arraignment and curt dismissal of her husband; yet she
knew, in her heart, that he was justified in both.  At the same time,
John was her husband, and the father of her child, and she was bound to
defend him--to be loyal to him as long as defense and loyalty were
possible.

She saw that it was useless to expect any concession from Mr. Young,
that it would be a waste of time and energy to argue with him.  So she
braced herself to meet the inevitable with what composure she could
command, and observed, with an air of quiet dignity:

"I will give Mr. Hungerford your message, Mr. Young.  I deeply regret
that you have been so disappointed in your expectations regarding him.
I feel confident, however, that there is good in him," she went on,
with wifely fealty; "that some time it will be developed, and that he
will win for himself a place and a name in the world.  I trust Madam
Young and the young ladies are well?" she graciously concluded, as she
saw that her visitor was becoming restive and anxious to terminate the
interview.

"Thank you; they are in their usual health," he replied, eagerly
seizing the opportunity she had so gracefully made for him, and his hat
at the same time.

Helen followed him to the door, where she bade him a courteous "good
afternoon;" then, as he passed from her presence, she sank,
strengthless, upon a chair, looking the picture of despair.

"Truly my burden is becoming heavier than I can bear," she moaned, in
bitterness of spirit.


When John Hungerford returned to his home and learned of his summary
dismissal from his uncle's employ, instead of appearing disturbed by
the unexpected information, he manifested undisguised relief and
satisfaction.

"Thank the propitious Fates!  So the old crank has given me the grand
bounce, has he?" he exclaimed, with sneering levity.

"'_Propitious_ Fates!'" repeated Helen, with grave disapproval.  "I
regard it as a great misfortune.  Pray, what do you intend to do for a
living in the future, John?"

"Oh, I'll look about and see what I can find--I reckon something will
turn up," he returned, with an air of indifference that smote his wife
keenly.

Whether he "looked about," or made any effort to obtain a position,
Helen had no means of knowing.  But weeks passed, and he was still
idle, having done absolutely nothing during that time for the provision
of his family.  He was sullen and disagreeable when at home, and
resented all inquiries regarding his movements.  Thus the husband and
wife could only drift farther and farther apart; for Helen was becoming
both discouraged and indignant in view of John's increasing apathy and
neglect, which seemed to imply that he felt no personal responsibility
and experienced no moral discomfort in allowing her to supply all the
needs of the household indefinitely.

Dorothy was now fourteen years of age, a very bright, attractive girl.
She was keenly observant of what was going on around her, and, as she
not infrequently was a sufferer from the inharmony pervading her home,
she was beginning to realize that something was very wrong between her
father and mother.  Helen, however, never encouraged either comments or
questions from her, and always evaded any reference to the strained
relations between her husband and herself.

But matters continued to grow worse, and were finally brought to a
climax one day when Dorothy burst in upon her, on returning from
school, in a state of great excitement, her face crimson from shame,
her eyes flashing with anger.

"Mamma, what _will_ you say?" she passionately exclaimed.  "I saw papa,
just now, riding in an auto with Marie Duncan, that opera singer who
has been singing at the Grand Theater all winter.  They were laughing,
and joking, and having a great time together.  Grace Winthrop was with
me, and I was so mortified I thought I'd die!"

Helen Hungerford lifted an ashen face to the speaker.

"Dorothy, are you _sure_?" she gasped, the startled throbbing of her
heart making her voice almost inaudible.

"Of course I am sure!" was the positive reply.  "There were so many
teams in the street the auto had to slow down as it passed the car we
were in, and papa saw us, and got awful red in the face.  He nodded to
us, but I just looked him straight back in the eye--I wouldn't notice
him.  Mamma, what makes him do such horrid things?  Why can't he be
nice, like other gentlemen?  Oh, I am so ashamed!  What will Grace
think?  What will everybody think?" she concluded wildly.

"Hush, Dorrie, dear; it can do no good to get so excited over it," said
Helen, her own lips quivering painfully as she folded the trembling
girl in her arms and kissed her tenderly.

Dorothy convulsively returned her embrace; then threw herself in a
torrent of tears upon the couch beside which her mother had been
sitting when she came in.

Helen allowed her to weep unrestrained, believing that the storm would
soonest spend itself in that way.  She sat beside her, white-faced,
heavy-hearted, and tried to confront the situation.

John, openly riding, in broad daylight, through the streets of the
city, with the opera star, betrayed a wantonness that defied all
conventionality or decorum.  It was an evidence of indifference to
public opinion, to his own respectability, and to the notoriety that
must reflect upon his family, which showed how thoroughly infatuated he
had become.

And in an automobile!  Whose car was it?  Did it belong to the actress,
or was John guilty of the extravagance of hiring it to take the woman
about?  If so, where did he get the money to pay for it, when he was
not supplying a dollar toward his own support or that of his family?

When John Hungerford entered his home that night, late as it was, he
found a wan-faced, hollow-eyed woman sitting up for him; yet, despite
the serpent sting in her heart, busy at work upon the week's mending.

"Well," he observed, in a half-jocose, half-defiant tone, although a
flush of shame swept his face as he met his wife's sad eyes, "I suppose
the kid told you?"

"Yes, Dorothy has told me where, and with whom, she saw you this
afternoon.  John, what does it mean?" Helen gravely returned.

Her manner, as well as his own accusing conscience, angered him, and he
swore--another evidence of his degeneration, for, as a rule, he had
been a gentleman, rarely allowing himself to use either profane or
vulgar language.  He had been deeply chagrined, that afternoon, on
coming almost face to face with Dorothy and her friend, the daughter of
one of San Francisco's highly respected citizens.  He had known, of
course, that Dorothy would tell her mother, which nettled him still
more, and now to be arraigned by Helen, to have her presume to dictate
terms to him, as he felt she would do, caused him to lose all control
of himself.

"I don't know that I am accountable to you for where I go, or with whom
I spend my time," he sullenly replied.

Helen sat erect, her own spirit now thoroughly aroused.

"Yes, you _are_ accountable to me when you compromise the honor of your
family--and in the presence of your own child," she said, her blazing
eyes looking straight into his; then she added, with quiet but
convincing firmness: "And the way we have been living of late cannot go
on any longer."

He regarded her with mingled surprise and inquiry.  Had the worm turned
at last?  Had his gentle, loyal, patient wife reached the limit of her
endurance?  Would she--did she mean that she would leave him?  It had
never occurred to him that she would take such a stand as this.

"What do you mean, Helen?" he demanded, with compressed lips.

"I mean that you are making my life intolerable--my burdens are heavier
than I can bear."

"You are jealous of Marie Duncan?" he said, a slight smile curling his
lips.

"Jealous--of _her_?  _No!_" cried Helen scornfully.  "A woman who will
accept the exclusive attentions of a married man, allowing him to
lavish upon her money that is needed by and rightly belongs to his
family, is worthy only of contempt.  But I _am_ concerned for my own
good name and yours, for the future of my child, that no taint shall
mar her prospects and sap the joy from her life.  So I say this state
of things must _stop_."

"Very well; let it stop, then!" John flung back angrily.  "Do you want
a divorce?"

"A divorce!  _I?_" cried Helen, scarce able to restrain a shriek of
aversion at the suggestion.  Then, swallowing hard, she panted: "I
could not be divorced."

"You are mistaken; the law will free you if you desire."

"The _law_!  It is an unholy law, made to accommodate vacillating
natures that lightly wed to-day and weary of their bonds to-morrow; it
is a blot and a shame upon the constitution that permits it, upon the
country that tolerates it.  No, no--it is not possible for me!"

She sat silent for a moment or two, her companion studying her uneasily
meanwhile.

"John," she presently resumed, bending nearer to him, and he could see
the pulses beating in her white throat from the intensity of her
emotion, "when I married you it was no light thing I did.  I gave
_myself_ to you--all that I was then, or ever hoped to be in this
life--until death should part us--_death_, do you understand?--not
until you should become weary of me, or until I found my burdens
heavier than I had thought, but for better or for worse, as long as
time should endure for us.  It was a vow that can never be annulled--a
hundred divorces would avail nothing; I marvel that you could suggest
the measure to me!  I am your wife, united to you not only by that
solemn ceremony that made us one, but by an indissoluble bond that
involves my honor, my love, and my loyalty--by that moral law that
never releases one from his voluntary oath--and your wife I shall
remain as long as I draw breath."

John Hungerford's face had changed many times from crimson to white as
he sat spellbound while his wife poured forth this passionate
revelation of her inmost self to him.

"Do you mean that you would not, _under any circumstances_, seek a
divorce from me?" he inquired, shifting uneasily in his chair, when she
ceased.

"Yes, that is what I mean."

"Suppose--that I should seek a divorce for myself?"

Helen's hand clenched spasmodically within the sock she had been
mending.

"I should still hold myself bound by my vows to you," she said, with
white lips.

The man shrugged his shoulders uncomfortably.

"Just what did you mean by saying that things cannot go on any longer
as they are going with us now?" he questioned.

"I meant that it devolves upon you to assume your share of the burden
of providing for your family; that I will not support you in idleness
any longer."

This was surely straightforward speaking, and John regarded his wife
curiously for a moment.  Hitherto she had been so patient and yielding
he had not believed her capable of taking such a stand.

"Well, if you wish to be rid of me, I suppose I can relieve you of my
presence."

"Where will you go?  How will you live?"

"Oh, I suppose 'the wind will be tempered to the shorn lamb,'" he
quoted, with mocking irreverence.

Helen sprang to her feet, and faced him with flaming eyes.  She felt
disgusted with and outraged by his utter indifference to her
long-suffering patience under many trials, and by his deplorable lack
of manliness.

"John Hungerford, where is your manhood?" she demanded, with cold
scorn.  "Where your respect for your wife, or your love for your child?
Do you not even possess _self_-respect?"

"I warn you not to push me too far," he retorted hotly, adding:
"Perhaps you really want me to get out--do you?" and he leaned toward
her, with a menacing look and air.

"No, for your own sake, I do not wish you to do that; but I do want you
to show yourself a man, and some recognition of your duty as a husband
and father," Helen spiritedly replied.  Then she dauntlessly continued:
"But I tell you again we cannot live this way any longer."

"'Duty!'  'Duty!'  That is always a woman's fling at a man, even if he
is down on his luck.  I'm not at all fond of this nagging, and I
believe, on the whole, we'd be better off apart," he angrily shot back
at her.

For a full minute Helen silently searched his face.  It was flushed,
sullen, dogged.

Was he really weary of the ties that bound him?  Was he tired of her
and of Dorothy?  Was he seeking an excuse to get out, hoping to rid
himself thereby of his moral responsibility, and be free to indulge his
admiration for the fascinating soubrette?  She was forced to believe
that he was--everything seemed to point to that end, and it was evident
that he had no intention of yielding to her terms; he would assume no
responsibilities that were irksome to him; no burdens to cumber him;
and suddenly all her outraged womanhood, wifehood, motherhood were
aroused to arms, overleaping the last point of endurance.

She drew herself to her full height, and confronted him with a spirit
he had never seen her manifest before.

"_As--you--please!_" she said, with freezing deliberation; and, pulling
from her hand the silken sock she had been mending for him when he came
in, she tossed it upon the floor at his feet.  She held his eye for
another brief moment, and he cringed visibly beneath the contemptuous
renunciation that he read in the look.  The next he was alone.  Helen
had fled to her chamber, where she fell, half fainting, upon her bed,
her heart broken, her spirit crushed.

A little later she heard the outer door close with a bang, and knew
that her husband had left the house.  Would he ever return?  Would she
really care if he never returned?

Her burdens and trials had been very heavy and perplexing during most
of her married life.  She had tried to be brave, loyal, and
self-sacrificing; she had laid her all upon the altar of her love for
this man, only to have her unceasing immolation ignored, as of no
special value, except in so far as it had relieved him of care,
clothed, fed, and sheltered him.  Now the last straw had been laid upon
her by his shameless devotion to a brazen actress, regardless of the
taint upon his own reputation and the scandal it must entail upon his
family.  It seemed, as she lay there, half conscious, as if this blow
had crushed every atom of affection for him out of her heart, and she
began to feel that, as far as she was concerned, it might be a blessed
release to be free from him forever.  Yet for his own and Dorothy's
sake, she would have continued to bear her cross indefinitely and
without a murmur, to save him from sin and to shield her child from the
disgrace that now threatened them all.

Days passed and lengthened into weeks, during which she did not once
see or hear from her husband; but one afternoon, upon returning from an
engagement out of town, she found that he had been in the house and
removed all of his personal belongings, together with the choicest of
his paintings and some rare curios which he had collected during their
honeymoon abroad.  This act convinced her that he intended their
separation to be final.

She had told Dorothy something of the recent stormy interview between
her husband and herself, because she believed it best to prepare her
for what she feared might be the outcome of it before very long.

During the earlier portion of her brief life Dorothy had been very fond
of her father, and he had always manifested a strong affection for her;
but during the last two years Helen had observed that the girl often
avoided him, that she grieved over his growing indifference to his
obligations and his home; while not infrequently she had openly
resented his treatment of her mother.

When Helen told her she thought it probable that her father would leave
them altogether, the girl sat in silent thought for several minutes.
Then she lifted adoring eyes to her mother's face.

"Mamma, if he _wants_ to go away from such a lovely wife as you have
been, because he--he likes that coarse, loud-talking woman I saw him
with that day, I--I'd just _let_ him go, and--and be glad to have him
away," she said, her face growing crimson, her eyes flashing resentment
in view of her father's wrongdoing.

"But, Dorrie, dear, he is your father, and----"

"My _father_!  He hasn't acted much like a father who cared anything
for his daughter!" Dorothy indignantly interposed.  "And he's been
horrid to _you_, lots of times.  He's been so _lazy_, too, lounging
around the house and letting you work so hard, and taking your _money_.
I've been so ashamed that he couldn't be like other gentlemen, and take
care of _us_.  I used to think I was proud of him, and loved him, for
he _is_ handsome and can be nice when he feels like it.  I--I don't
like to go near him now, though, and I haven't wanted to kiss him for a
long time.  But I love _you_, mamma, dear, with all my heart; and if he
does go away I will try to be so good to you that--that perhaps you
won't mind it quite so much," the child concluded, with a burst of
tears, as she threw herself into her mother's arms, and clung to her
convulsively.

Helen was deeply touched by this spontaneous outburst of love and
loyalty, and, as she thought the matter over more and more, she began
to feel that if John's infatuation could not be broken--if he was past
redemption--it would be better for Dorothy, perhaps, to be away from
his influence.

A month later Helen received notice from a lawyer, informing her of her
husband's intention of applying for a divorce; he also stated that Mr.
Hungerford desired a personal interview for the purpose of definitely
arranging the matter with her.

Helen acceded to this request, and the scene recorded in our opening
chapter followed a few days later, when John Hungerford learned, much
to his surprise, that his wife would oppose no obstacle to his desire
and efforts to secure a legal separation from her; when she had told
him he might go free, as soon as the law would allow, provided he would
relinquish all claim to Dorothy and did not attempt to compromise
herself in any way.

The result we already know.  The divorce was granted.  John Hungerford
went immediately abroad, ostensibly to resume his art studies, but
really to follow the woman who had won his allegiance from his wife,
and Helen was left to meet the situation alone as best she could.


"I have decided to leave San Francisco.  I will not have Dorothy's life
spoiled by this wretched scandal, which she will never be allowed to
forget if we remain here.  I am going to put three thousand miles
between our past history and ourselves.  I am going to New York City to
live."

Thus announced Helen Hungerford while discussing her future with her
lifelong friend, Mrs. Horace Hamilton, who had been not only her chum
throughout their college course, and her maid of honor at her marriage,
but had faithfully stood by her in all her trials since her return from
Europe.  It was she who had helped her to secure music scholars, who
had been first and foremost in introducing her as a chamber-concert
singer, and launching her upon the career that had proved such a signal
success.  She had also been especially kind and loyal at the time of
her husband's desertion, and shielded her in every possible way from
the gossip and scandal attending the unfortunate separation.

"Mercy, dear, won't it be flying in the face of Providence for you to
race wildly off to the other side of the continent?" exclaimed Mrs.
Hamilton, in a startled tone, adding sympathetically: "I am forced to
admit that your position here is certainly very trying, Helen; but this
seems to me like a perfectly mad scheme.  Do you know a single soul in
New York?"

"No, I do not; and that is just the reason why I am going there."

"But you are so well established, and have so many stanch friends here;
the sympathies of every one who knows you and the trials you have had
to encounter are with you," objected her companion.

"I know that; everybody has been heavenly kind to me, and I fully
appreciate it," said Helen, with starting tears.  "But I don't want
_sympathy_--I simply want to forget; and I will not have Dorothy
weighed down with pity, and all the brightness and hope crushed out of
her life," she concluded passionately, and flushing with hot resentment
against her hard lot.

"But I am afraid you will have an awfully hard struggle all alone in
New York," said her friend, looking deeply troubled.  "And yet--I don't
know"--her face clearing suddenly--"Lena Jerome, Horace's sister, is
prominent in society there.  She is a dear, and would do anything to
help a friend of ours.  You certainly are a fine music teacher,
Helen--you make all your pupils love you, and I believe that is one
secret of your success; and you sing divinely at drawing-room
functions.  Lena would be just the one to aid you in securing the right
kind of scholars, and to secure for you the entrée to society for
entertaining, as you have done here.  After all, I do believe it will
be the very best thing for you to do, if--if the expense of such a
change will not be too much for you," Mrs. Hamilton concluded, with
some embarrassment, for she believed that John Hungerford had left his
wife absolutely penniless.

"I have saved some money from my own earnings," Helen explained.  "It
has been uphill work since John gave up business, but I have never
allowed myself to spend every dollar of my income; I have managed to
put away something every month--'an emergency nest egg,' I have called
it.  Then, the little my father left me I have sacredly hoarded to
defray the expense of a college course for Dorothy; so I am sure I can
manage very well, even in New York, until I can secure pupils and
engagements.  I shall be very grateful to Mr. Hamilton's sister if she
will take me under her friendly wing for a little while, until I become
established.  Belle, what should I have done without you?  You have
been my sheet anchor in this heartbreaking storm."

She reached out, clasped her friend's hand, and laid it against her
lips, as she ceased speaking.

Mrs. Hamilton slipped an affectionate arm about her waist, and drew her
close, hot tears of rebellion welling to her eyes as she recalled the
evening of Helen's brilliant wedding, when they had stood side by side
beneath the great arch of white roses in the Appletons' lovely home,
and contrasted the seemingly bright outlook of that occasion with her
present blighted hopes and broken heart.

"Well, you know it was always 'you and I together, love,' in the old
days at college--one never had a pleasure or a trouble that the other
did not share, and I am sure we love each other as well to-day, if not
better, than we did then," she fondly replied; then added, with
cheerful animation: "Now, let me tell you that your plan appeals to me
more and more.  I can see that you and Dorothy will escape a great deal
of depressing and exasperating scandal by this change; thus, as you
have said, the dear child's future will not be marred by continual
reminders of the unhappy experiences of the last few years.  You have
brought her up admirably thus far, Helen--she gives promise of becoming
a beautiful and talented woman; and I believe when we have you well
settled in New York you will both be happier than you have been for a
long time."

"What a blessing it is to have a loyal friend!" breathed Helen
gratefully.  "You have cheered me more than I can tell you, and, with
your assurance of Mrs. Jerome's influence to help me in my future
career, my courage is greatly strengthened.  I--I shall ask you to
introduce us to her as--Mrs. and Miss Dorothy _Ford_," she concluded,
with some hesitation, as she searched her friend's face to see how she
would receive this suggestion.

"That is another plan of which I heartily approve," returned Mrs.
Hamilton, with unfeigned satisfaction.  "Put away from
you--_forget_--all that is possible pertaining to the sad past, and
take a new lease of life and happiness.  But for Dorothy, I would have
advised that you resume your maiden name.  'Ford' will do very nicely,
though.  A new name may have the effect of strengthening your feeling
of independence, and will not expose you to inquiries concerning John
Hungerford.  Now, dear heart, I must go straight home--it is almost
dinner time, and I am eager to tell Horace of your plan for the future.
I feel sure that he also will think well of it.  I will send the car
around for you and Dorrie to come and dine with us to-morrow night, and
we will all talk it over together more at length."

Mr. Hamilton, who was a wise counselor, did think well of Helen's
contemplated change of residence, and as he advised her to get away as
early as practicable from all unpleasant reminders, she began at once
to prepare for her departure.

She disposed of all her household furniture, knowing it would be very
expensive and troublesome to move it across the continent; and, as she
still had some fine old pieces that had been in her family for many
years, she realized from this sale a snug sum, that would go far toward
furnishing her new home upon reaching her destination.

This involved much care and labor, and she found her fortitude and
strength were well-nigh spent when all was over, and her once pretty
apartment shorn of all that had once made it an attractive home.

The Hamiltons had insisted upon having Dorothy and herself spend a week
with them and have a good rest before leaving for New York, and Helen
had deferred until this time a few errands and small matters of
business that remained to be attended to.

One of these was the withdrawal of Dorothy's money from the
institutions where it had been deposited.  But when she opened her
treasure box, where she had always kept important papers, her mother's
jewelry, and other choice mementoes, the bank books were not to be
found.

She could not believe the evidence of her own eyes, and searched the
contents of the receptacle over and over, with, alas! the same result.

With a sinking heart, she flew to the bank officials, to make
inquiries, only to be told, with evident surprise, in view of her
ignorance of the fact, that Mr. Hungerford had, as Dorothy's legal
guardian, closed the accounts some three months previous.

This terrible and unlooked-for blow was the overflowing drop in Helen's
cup of woe, and for the first time in her life she was utterly
prostrated, the shock resulting in a serious illness that kept her in
bed for three miserable weeks.

Once again faithful Belle Hamilton and her good husband proved the
unfailing loyalty of their friendship.  The pleasantest room in their
beautiful home was assigned to the suffering woman; the family
physician and a good nurse were drafted into her service, and nothing
spared that would contribute to her comfort and restoration.

But Helen was not only physically exhausted; she was also heartsick and
weary of the struggle to live, and, for a time, it seemed doubtful
which way the tide would turn.  But her motherhood was her salvation,
and the crisis was at length safely passed.

"If it were not for Dorrie, I would gladly give up the battle," she
said weakly to her friend one day, when she was beginning to
convalesce, yet with her strength at a very low ebb.  "If--if I _have_
to leave her, Belle, I know you will still be a good friend to her, as
you have been to me."

"Next to Horace and you, Dorrie is my best beloved, and I have no
children of my own.  I do not need to say more, Helen," returned Mrs.
Hamilton, her composure sadly shaken.  "But, dearie," she added
cheerily, as she fondly stroked the brown head upon the pillow, "you
will not have to leave her.  Doctor Allen told Horace yesterday that
you are coming out all right, and I beg you will not allow yourself to
think anything else, for Dorrie needs her _mother_; no one else can do
for her what you can do.  Now, Helen," she went on, with grave
authority, "you simply _must_ put out of your consciousness every
desponding thought, for your own sake, as well as ours.  Don't worry
about money, or how you are going to manage when you get to New York;
everything will be taken care of for you until you can take care of
yourself, and I know if you will only call back your courage, take a
fresh grip on hope, and do your best to get well, you will ultimately
conquer every adverse circumstance, and you and Dorothy will yet have a
beautiful and happy life together."

This sensible advice, together with the love and cheerful atmosphere
surrounding her, was very helpful to the invalid, and she improved more
rapidly from that time.

She _had_ "worried about money" and what would be the outcome of her
overwhelming misfortune, for, with what little she had left, she knew
it would be impossible to defray the expenses of the journey to and
make a home upon her arrival in New York.  It had almost seemed as if
she were fated to remain in San Francisco and meekly take up again the
work she had just relinquished, even though Dorothy's whole future
might be marred thereby.

But her friend's reassuring talk had put new heart into her, and she
immediately began to plan her work for the coming winter.  By another
week she was able to be up and dressed, and, with her physician's
sanction, the day of her departure was set seven days later.

One evening, on coming home to dinner, Mr. Hamilton informed his wife,
after they were all seated at the table, that important business called
him to New York, and, with the time it would take going and returning,
he would probably be absent from home nearly a month.  He concluded by
inquiring, in a matter-of-fact tone:

"How would you like to come with me, Belle, and make that long-promised
visit to Lena?"

"How delightful!  I should like it exceedingly," replied Mrs. Hamilton,
lifting a searching look to her husband's face.  This was the first she
had heard about "business in New York," and she had a strong suspicion
that some other motive had prompted this sudden trip.

A twinkle shot into the gentleman's eyes as they met her own, which
quickly suffused with tears as she realized that this plan was simply a
ruse to protect and support Helen throughout her long journey and see
her comfortably settled in her new home upon the far side of the
continent.

Mr. Hamilton hastened to her rescue, for he saw that she was very near
losing her composure and spoiling everything.

"We haven't had a real outing together, dear, for a long time," he
smilingly observed; "and when Mr. Ashley told me this morning he
thought we'd better send some one to New York and Washington to look
into some complications that have arisen in connection with our new
patents, I told him I would be glad to go myself.  I thought it would
be very pleasant for you and me to bear our departing friends company
on their long journey--oh, Dorrie, what do you think of it?" he
concluded, turning to the girl, who always sat at his right hand at
table--a privilege she greatly appreciated.

"Oh, Uncle Horace, I think it will be just--_grand_!" she exclaimed,
clapping her hands for joy.  "It won't seem _quite_ so much like going
away from you and Aunt Belle altogether."

He reached out a shapely hand and patted her softly on the shoulder, a
suspicion of tears in his own eyes, for the child had greatly endeared
herself to him during her stay in the house.

"Well, then, Belle, dear, if you can get your grip packed by Monday
morning, I will be ready to act as escort for the party to the great
and terrible city of Gotham."

"Grip, indeed!" exclaimed his wife, in mock indignation, but giving him
a roguish look.  "I am expecting to take a trunk, containing several
empty trays, with me, if you please.  Pray, did you imagine that you
were going to take me to New York--the Paris of America--and bring me
home again, without being well stocked with the prettiest things I
could find?"

Mr. Hamilton gravely put down his knife and fork, drew forth a very
flat-looking wallet, and laid it upon the table before Dorothy, with a
dejected air.

"Open it, sweetheart, and tell me if you do not think your auntie is a
very unreasonable woman and your uncle a much-abused man," he said, in
an injured tone.

Dorothy unfolded the receptacle, carefully looked it through, and
brought to light a single twenty-dollar bill.

Her brows contracted in perplexity.  She studied the crisp note for a
moment, then naïvely returned:

"Why, Uncle Horace, that isn't _all_ you will have to spend in New
York, is it?  I--I thought you were--were very rich!"

A burst of laughter greeted her innocent remark, at which Dorothy
flushed rosily, to find a joke had been played upon her; then, quietly
returning the bill to its place, she passed the wallet to Mr. Hamilton,
and observed demurely:

"I guess auntie knows what she is about, and where to find more when
she wants it," at which a second outburst brought a dimple into her own
cheeks.

"Dorothy, I did not think that of you!  Do you know what faithful Mrs.
Micawber was in the habit of saying to Mr. Micawber?" inquired Mr.
Hamilton, with an assumption of severity.

"Yes, sir; but I don't think _Mr._ Micawber was in the habit of playing
_tricks_ upon _Mrs._ Micawber," retorted Dorothy, the mischievous
dimples deepening, while Mrs. Hamilton applauded gleefully with both
hands.

"So you are going to desert me, if I play tricks upon you!  Well, I
can't afford to lose my sweetheart, so we will try to be good
friends--at least until we reach New York, and I promise you auntie
shall not suffer for pretty things," said the gentleman, bestowing a
fond look upon her and a smile upon his wife.

"Oh, Uncle Horace, I wish _you_ were going to live in New York, too,"
the girl observed wistfully.  "If I could only have you, and Aunt
Belle, and Grace Winthrop, I would be perfectly happy."

"You will miss Grace, but you will find nice friends wherever you go,"
said Mrs. Hamilton kindly; then the conversation turned upon plans for
the coming trip.

The next few days were busy ones, and Monday morning found the party of
four en route for the East; and with her good friends to bear her
cheerful company Helen bade a final farewell to her "Valley of Achor,"
and turned her face toward the rising sun, with something of hope in
her heart, to begin anew the battle of life for herself and her child,
in a great, unknown city.

Upon their arrival in New York, the Hamiltons helped her to find and
furnish a small apartment in a good location, these faithful friends
manifesting a keen enjoyment and interest in their work that was most
inspiring to Helen.

It certainly was a very attractive little nest when the last touches
were put to it--"a haven of rest," she told them, after her battle with
the rough storms and winds that had wrecked her bark and left her
bruised and broken upon the barren shore of despair.

Before it was time for the Hamiltons to return to San Francisco, both
mother and daughter began to feel quite at home in their quiet corner
of the mighty city, and to manifest a serenity, even something of
happiness, that was very gratifying to these good people, who felt
deeply concerned for their future.

They had been introduced to the Jeromes, who had cordially opened their
hearts and home to them, and who assured Mr. Hamilton that they would
do everything in their power to launch Mrs. Ford upon her career during
the coming season; while Mollie Jerome, their daughter, about the same
age of Dorothy, was at once greatly attracted to her new little friend.

"Mamma, I think she is _almost_ as nice as Grace, and isn't it
beautiful to have found some one to love so quickly?" Dorothy confided
to her mother one night, on her return after having been entertained
all day in the elegant home of the Jeromes.

By the first of October, through the influence of Mrs. Homer Jerome,
Helen had secured a number of pupils and an engagement to sing at a
fashionable reception, the date of which was set for the third of
November.

With this small but promising beginning, her spirits began to rise, and
she found all her former energy and love for her work returning.

She was gaining rapidly in flesh and strength; the lines of care and
trouble were fast fading out of her face, even though there were times
when she was broken-hearted and passionately rebellious, in view of her
husband's dishonor and faithlessness, and her own miserable position as
a deserted wife.

Her first work, after getting settled in her little home, was to put
Dorothy into a good school, after which she gave herself up for several
hours of every day to systematic practice to get in good voice for her
first appearance in New York society as a drawing-room artiste.


  The thorns I have reaped are of the tree
  I planted; they have torn me and I bled;
  I should have known what fruit would spring from such
        a seed.  BYRON.


It is a brilliant, star-lighted night in December.

In an even more brilliantly illuminated mansion on Fifth Avenue, New
York City, a distinguished company is assembled.  Elderly and
middle-aged gentlemen, dignified and imposing, with the suggestion of
opulence pervading every look and movement; young men, alert and full
of vigor, all clad in conventional dress suits and immaculate linen;
stately and beautiful matrons, elegantly robed in velvet and costly
laces; younger women resplendent in all the tints of the rainbow, and
flashing with diamonds and other many-hued gems; pretty débutantes, in
diaphanous and saintly white, gleaming like spotless lilies in beds of
variegated poppies; flowers and perfume everywhere; entrancing melody
from an invisible orchestra, mingling with many musical voices, joyous
laughter, and the rustle and swish of silk and satin--all contributed
to produce a wonderful scene and an exhilarating atmosphere, which
assumed life to be one long, gorgeous gala day, with never a cloud to
dim its brightness or cast its shadow upon these gay votaries of
fashion and pleasure.

Suddenly the music of the orchestra ceased, and presently a few
dominant chords were struck upon a fine-toned concert-grand piano, as
if to demand attention and silence.

The next moment a woman of beautiful and gracious presence stepped upon
a low platform beside the instrument, whereupon the buzzing of many
voices was hushed, and an air of eager expectation pervaded the company.

The dominant chords were followed by a rippling prelude, which soon
dropped into the more precise rhythm of an accompaniment; then a
glorious voice, full, rich, and thrillingly sympathetic, broke upon the
stillness, rising, falling, and trilling easily and naturally as a
bird, that, conscious only of the supreme impulse within his throbbing
breast and vibrating in his wonderful little throat, pours forth his
joy-laden soul in enraptured and exquisite song.

Every eye within range of her was fastened upon the singer, a queenly
matron, charmingly gowned in some soft material of pale-pink lavender.
Her abundant brown hair was becomingly arranged and surmounted by a
glittering aigrette of jewels, her only visible ornament.  She was good
to look upon as well as to listen to, and bore herself with the ease
and poise of one long accustomed to entertain fashionable audiences
like the present, yet without a suggestion of self-consciousness to mar
her excellent work.

She rendered a group of three classical songs with artistic effect that
won for her a round of hearty applause as she ceased.  She gracefully
acknowledged the tribute paid her, then turned and smilingly nodded to
some one who had evidently been sitting near her.  Immediately a lovely
girl, robed in white, arose, and took her stand at the left of the
artiste.

A flutter of excitement throughout the room indicated the anticipation
of some unusual treat as harp, violin, and cello, accompanied by the
piano, rendered an inspiring introduction, which was followed by a
familiar duet from one of the standard operas, and executed with an
exquisite interpretation and spirit that held every listener spellbound
to the end, and evoked a storm of enthusiastic approval upon its
conclusion.

"Jove! can't they sing!  Who are they, Jerome?  Sisters, I should
judge, by their strong resemblance to each other, and the younger is
simply adorable!"

Mr. Homer Jerome, the host of the evening, smiled, his fine eyes
twinkling with secret satisfaction at these flattering compliments
bestowed upon the protégées of his wife by the aristocratic and
fastidious Clifford Alexander, the son of an old college chum, who had
recently returned from several years' sojourn in Europe.

"The elder lady is Madam Ford, who has become quite noted in New York
during the last ten years as a drawing-room artiste.  She is in great
demand among society people, and never fails to give satisfaction to an
appreciative audience.  Her companion is Miss Dorothy Ford, madam's
daughter," Mr. Jerome explained.

"You don't mean to tell me that the lady in lavender is the mother of
the other!  It doesn't seem possible!" exclaimed the first speaker,
astonished.

"I am sure Madam Ford would appreciate the flattering, though indirect,
compliment you have paid her, my boy," observed his host, with a genial
laugh.  "Madam is certainly a very youthful-looking woman, considering
her age and checkered experiences, for, some years ago, she was left
penniless to battle, single-handed, with the world, and she has seen
much trouble."

"She is a widow, then?"

"Um--er--I think it was about ten years ago that she lost her husband,"
was Mr. Jerome's somewhat noncommittal reply; then he hastened to add:
"But she faced the situation with indomitable courage and energy, and,
possessing much native talent, a beautiful voice, and a charming
personality, she has achieved a brilliant career for herself."

"Evidently she has found a very warm friend in Mr. Homer Jerome, to
whom, perhaps, she may owe something of her success in life," observed
Mr. Alexander, to whom his host's generous-spirited philanthropy was no
secret.

"I esteem it an honor to be numbered among Madam Ford's friends,"
heartily returned Mr. Jerome.  "She was really a protégée of my wife's,
to begin with, and we have seen a good deal of her during the ten years
of our acquaintance--first, to admire her for her heroism and
perseverance under difficulties, and later to love her for herself.
The daughter is no less lovely than her mother," the gentleman
continued, his eyes lingering fondly upon the girl.  "Madam has given
her every possible advantage, and when she discovered that she also
possessed a promising voice she placed her under one of our finest
teachers, here in New York, with what result you have just had the
pleasure of ascertaining."

"She is surely deserving of laurels for this evening's work," said the
young man appreciatively.

"Particularly as this is her first appearance in a professional rôle.
Her voice is powerful, rich, and sympathetic.  I would not be surprised
if Miss Dorothy eventually outclasses her mother as an artist."  And
Mr. Jerome beamed satisfaction upon his favorite as he concluded.

"Dorothy Ford," mused Clifford Alexander, his voice lingering upon the
name while his fine eyes studied the face of the beautiful girl, who
was now chatting socially with a group of people who were offering
hearty congratulations to both mother and daughter.  "It is a
peculiarly euphonious name for a very attractive young woman.
Introduce me, will you, Jerome?"

"With the greatest pleasure," responded that gentleman, with a sly
smile; and a few minutes later Mr. Alexander was making his best bow
before Madam Ford, whom he found even more charming at close range than
at a distance; and then the usually imperturbable young man found
himself experiencing unaccustomed heart throbs upon being presented to
the adorable Dorothy.

The girl did not offer him her hand, but, after gracefully
acknowledging the introduction, lifted her limpid gray eyes to the
gentleman's face with an earnest, straightforward look which told him
that she was one who judged people somewhat from first impressions.

His glance held hers for a moment, during which he was particularly
attracted by the sweet serenity of her gaze, while he was at the same
time conscious that every feature of her lovely face was aglow with
intelligence and vivacity.

Her skin was fine and clear, with a touch of rose on her cheeks; her
lips a vivid scarlet.  A wealth of red-brown hair was arranged high on
her head, thus adding to her stature and poise; her features, though by
no means perfect, were fascinatingly expressive, especially when she
spoke or smiled.

Her graceful, symmetrical figure was clad in virgin white, with no
ornament save a string of rare pearls that once had belonged to her
grandmother Appleton; and, to her new acquaintance, Dorothy Ford
appeared the embodiment of loveliness and purity.

"Allow me to thank you both for the great pleasure I have just
enjoyed," Mr. Alexander remarked, when their greetings were over, the
sincerity in his tones saving his observation from seeming triteness.

Madam Ford smiled with motherly pride as she gracefully thanked him,
and, bending a fond glance upon Dorothy, added:

"I really feel that my daughter is entitled to congratulations, since
this is her first appearance, professionally, before a critical
audience.  I must confess, however, to having experienced some inward
quakings in view of that fact; but her first note reassured me----"

"Why, mamma, I am surprised!" laughingly interposed Dorothy, but
flushing with pleasure, nevertheless, in view of her mother's
commendation, Mr. Jerome's approving eyes, and the evident appreciation
of her new acquaintance--"after all your careful coaching, not to
mention Signor Rotoni's merciless training for this important event!
Moreover, the burden of responsibility rested entirely upon you, and I
wasn't conscious of a quake, though I confess I might not have felt
quite so confident if I had been obliged to face all these people
alone."

"So this is your début before society, Miss Ford?" Mr. Alexander
observed, and charmed by the maiden's refreshing ingenuousness.

"Yes, as a vocalist; not socially, however, for Mrs. Jerome kindly
introduced me, with Miss Jerome, some time ago," Dorothy replied,
adding: "I have, perhaps, enjoyed some advantages to give me confidence
which débutantes, as a rule, do not have.  Mamma having been so much
before the public, I have also had my responsibilities in the
profession, for"--with a laughing glance at her mother--"I have
frequently acted as her chaperon when she has had engagements at a
distance from home."

"'Chaperon!'  That is rather good, Helen," Mr. Jerome here dryly
interposed, and bending a pair of twinkling eyes upon madam.  "Well,
you do look almost youthful enough to need a chaperon; Alexander was
saying only a few moments ago he thought you and Dorothy must be
sisters."

"There, mamma, now will you believe what I said to you before we left
home?" gleefully exclaimed Dorothy.  "I told her," she went on, nodding
brightly at Mr. Jerome, "that she is growing younger every year, and no
one would suspect that she is the mother of a twenty-five-year-old
daughter----"

"'Sh--'sh!  Oh, Dorrie, _how_ indiscreet to tell it!" interposed her
host, in pretended consternation at her frankness.

"Perhaps it was," retorted the girl, with a roguish gleam in her eyes.
"I did not realize what my admission would imply, and I humbly beg
mamma's pardon for trespassing upon so delicate a subject," and she
curtsied with mock humility to her mother, without a vestige of
self-consciousness for having given away her own age.

"Now, I suppose it behooves me to offer thanks to Mr. Alexander for a
very pretty compliment," demurely observed Madam Ford, when the laugh
at Dorothy's clever repartee had subsided.

"Oh, Helen," groaned Mr. Jerome, who dearly loved to hector, "I am
surprised to hear you giving thanks for a compliment at your charming
daughter's expense!"  Then, turning to Dorothy, he added, with an air
of commiseration: "Dorrie, dear, you have my deepest sympathy in view
of your aged appearance; if you had only not persisted in growing up,
so early, to be so mature, tall, and stately, people would not have
been so prone to mistake you for your mother's sister," he concluded,
bestowing a reproachful look upon the young man standing beside her.

"Really, Jerome," Clifford Alexander here laughingly interposed, but
with heightening color beneath his friend's persistent banter, "I seem
inadvertently to have stumbled upon dangerous ground, and there appears
to be no way to either advance or retreat with any glory to myself.
Pray tell me how I am to propitiate so gallant a champion as you have
constituted yourself; also this fair lady"--with a deprecating glance
at Dorothy--"whose cause you so ardently espouse."

"This 'fair lady' and her 'champion,' as you are pleased to regard me,
have been lovers ever since she was a small girl in short dresses, I
would have you understand, and I warn you, young man, that I am very
jealous for her--eh, Dorothy?" Mr. Jerome asserted, with a delightful
air of proprietorship.  "However," he continued, "I can assure you she
is easily propitiated, for she is exceedingly amiable."

"That, I am sure, goes without saying," affably assented the young man.





 



